1 | break (noun): a short rest from work or study | loc: mola
  EN TS: His "short" break is too long.
  tr TS: Onun "kısa" molası fazla uzun sürdü.
  EN FS: His "short" run is too long.
  tr FS: Onun "kısa" koşusu fazla uzun sürdü.
  EN TP: a short phone break
  tr TP: kısa bir telefon molası
  EN FP: a short coffee break
  tr FP: kısa bir kahve molası
2 | certificate (noun): official proof that you finished a course | loc: sertifika
  EN TS: She has so many certificates!
  tr TS: O kadar çok sertifikası var ki!
  EN FS: She has so many medals!
  tr FS: O kadar çok madalyası var ki!
  EN TP: showing her certificates
  tr TP: sertifikalarını göstermek
  EN FP: printing her certificates
  tr FP: sertifikalarını yazdırmak
3 | class (noun): teaching given as a series of lessons | loc: sınıf
  EN TS: Her class is crazy!
  tr TS: Sınıfı resmen çıldırmış!
  EN FS: Her class is sleeping!
  tr FS: Sınıfı resmen uyuyor!
  EN TP: a class out of control
  tr TP: kontrolden çıkmış bir sınıf
  EN FP: a class trip abroad
  tr FP: yurt dışına sınıf gezisi
4 | course (noun): a series of lessons on one subject | loc: kurs
  EN TS: She has an online course.
  tr TS: Online bir kursu var.
  EN FS: She has an online meeting.
  tr FS: Online bir toplantısı var.
  EN TP: an online course at home
  tr TP: evde online bir kurs
  EN FP: a cooking course at school
  tr FP: okulda bir yemek kursu
6 | cushion (noun): a soft pillow-like pad you sit or lean on | loc: minder
  EN TS: One cushion is not enough.
  tr TS: Bir minder yetmez.
  EN FS: One chair is not enough.
  tr FS: Bir sandalye yetmez.
  EN TP: a pile of cushions
  tr TP: bir yığın minder
  EN FP: a pile of blankets
  tr FP: bir yığın battaniye
7 | graduation (noun): the ceremony where you receive your diploma | loc: mezuniyet
  EN TS: It is his graduation day.
  tr TS: Bugün genç adamın mezuniyet günü.
  EN FS: It is her graduation day.
  tr FS: Bugün genç kadının mezuniyet günü.
  EN TP: a graduation ceremony
  tr TP: bir mezuniyet töreni
  EN FP: a graduation present
  tr FP: bir mezuniyet hediyesi
8 | keycard (noun): a plastic card that unlocks an electronic lock | loc: anahtar kart
  EN TS: She blamed the keycard. Wrong door.
  tr TS: Suçu anahtar karta attı. Kapı yanlış.
  EN FS: She blamed the suitcase. Wrong door.
  tr FS: Suçu bavula attı. Kapı yanlış.
  EN TP: tapping the keycard
  tr TP: anahtar kartı okutmak
  EN FP: losing the keycard
  tr FP: anahtar kartı kaybetmek
9 | laboratory (noun): a room with equipment for doing experiments | loc: laboratuvar
  EN TS: This is a busy laboratory.
  tr TS: Burası yoğun bir laboratuvar.
  EN FS: This is a busy kitchen.
  tr FS: Burası yoğun bir mutfak.
  EN TP: working in a laboratory
  tr TP: laboratuvarda çalışmak
  EN FP: cleaning a laboratory
  tr FP: laboratuvarı temizlemek
10 | leaf (noun): one of the flat green parts growing on a tree | loc: yaprak
  EN TS: A leaf is a free umbrella!
  tr TS: Yaprak dediğin bedava şemsiye!
  EN FS: A leaf is a free blanket!
  tr FS: Yaprak dediğin bedava battaniye!
  EN TP: a giant green leaf
  tr TP: kocaman yeşil bir yaprak
  EN FP: a giant green frog
  tr FP: kocaman yeşil bir kurbağa
11 | library (noun): a place full of books you can read or borrow | loc: kütüphane
  EN TS: This library is huge!
  tr TS: Bu kütüphane devasa!
  EN FS: This library is tiny!
  tr FS: Bu kütüphane minicik!
  EN TP: a huge old library
  tr TP: devasa, eski bir kütüphane
  EN FP: a small school library
  tr FP: küçük bir okul kütüphanesi
13 | napkin (noun): a piece of cloth or paper to wipe your mouth | loc: peçete
  EN TS: Her napkin is a work of art!
  tr TS: Peçetesi resmen sanat eseri!
  EN FS: Her cake is a work of art!
  tr FS: Pastası resmen sanat eseri!
  EN TP: folding a napkin
  tr TP: peçete katlamak
  EN FP: a napkin on the floor
  tr FP: yerde bir peçete
14 | page (noun): one side of a sheet of paper in a book | loc: sayfa
  EN TS: A flower is going on the page.
  tr TS: Sayfaya bir çiçek konuyor.
  EN FS: A photo is going on the page.
  tr FS: Sayfaya bir fotoğraf konuyor.
  EN TP: a page with flowers
  tr TP: çiçekli bir sayfa
  EN FP: a page in a newspaper
  tr FP: gazetede bir sayfa
15 | pill (noun): a small round medicine that you swallow | loc: hap
  EN TS: One pill and he is fine.
  tr TS: Bir hap, adam turp gibi.
  EN FS: One coffee and he is fine.
  tr FS: Bir kahve, adam turp gibi.
  EN TP: swallowing a white pill
  tr TP: beyaz bir hap yutmak
  EN FP: a pill for sleeping
  tr FP: bir uyku hapı
16 | presentation (noun): a talk where you show your work to a group | loc: sunum
  EN TS: She is giving a presentation.
  tr TS: Sunum yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is giving a concert.
  tr FS: Konser veriyor.
  EN TP: giving a presentation
  tr TP: sunum yapmak
  EN FP: watching a presentation
  tr FP: sunum izlemek
17 | project (noun): a planned piece of work that takes time | loc: proje
  EN TS: The project: one wooden shed.
  tr TS: Proje: tek bir ahşap kulübe.
  EN FS: The project: one wooden boat.
  tr FS: Proje: tek bir ahşap tekne.
  EN TP: a big shed project
  tr TP: büyük bir kulübe projesi
  EN FP: a school project on paper
  tr FP: kâğıt üstünde okul projesi
18 | root (noun): the part of a plant that grows under the ground | loc: kök
  EN TS: She is washing the roots.
  tr TS: Kökleri yıkıyor.
  EN FS: She is cutting the roots.
  tr FS: Kökleri kesiyor.
  EN TP: rinsing the roots
  tr TP: kökleri durulamak
  EN FP: roots of a big tree
  tr FP: koca bir ağacın kökleri
19 | ruler (noun): a flat stick for measuring and drawing lines | loc: cetvel
  EN TS: He found a ruler at last!
  tr TS: Sonunda bir cetvel buldu!
  EN FS: He found a pencil at last!
  tr FS: Sonunda bir kalem buldu!
  EN TP: drawing with a ruler
  tr TP: cetvelle çizmek
  EN FP: drawing with a compass
  tr FP: pergelle çizmek
20 | schedule (noun): a plan of the things you must do and when | loc: program
  EN TS: Full schedule, but sleep wins!
  tr TS: Program dolu ama uyku kazanır!
  EN FS: Full schedule, but work wins!
  tr FS: Program dolu ama iş kazanır!
  EN TP: a full schedule
  tr TP: dolu bir program
  EN FP: a bus schedule
  tr FP: bir otobüs tarifesi
21 | school (noun): a place where children go to learn | loc: okul
  EN TS: Welcome to my school, bro.
  tr TS: Okuluma hoş geldin kanka.
  EN FS: Welcome to my office, bro.
  tr FS: Ofisime hoş geldin kanka.
  EN TP: a tour of my school
  tr TP: okulumda bir tur
  EN FP: a tour of my office
  tr FP: ofisimde bir tur
22 | scientist (noun): a person who studies nature and does experiments | loc: bilim insanı
  EN TS: The scientist loves charts.
  tr TS: Bilim insanı grafiklere bayılıyor.
  EN FS: The student loves charts.
  tr FS: Öğrenci grafiklere bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a scientist with a clipboard
  tr TP: not altlıklı bir bilim insanı
  EN FP: a scientist with a microscope
  tr FP: mikroskoplu bir bilim insanı
23 | speech (noun): a formal talk given to an audience | loc: konuşma
  EN TS: She is giving a formal speech.
  tr TS: Resmi bir konuşma yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is giving a short concert.
  tr FS: Kısa bir konser veriyor.
  EN TP: a heartfelt speech
  tr TP: içten bir konuşma
  EN FP: a speech bubble
  tr FP: bir konuşma balonu
24 | spoon (noun): a tool with a small bowl for eating liquid food | loc: kaşık
  EN TS: Her spoon emptied the whole bowl!
  tr TS: Kaşığı koca kaseyi bitirdi!
  EN FS: Her fork emptied the whole bowl!
  tr FS: Çatalı koca kaseyi bitirdi!
  EN TP: a spoon full of soup
  tr TP: çorba dolu bir kaşık
  EN FP: a spoon full of sugar
  tr FP: şeker dolu bir kaşık
25 | stapler (noun): a tool that joins papers with small metal clips | loc: zımba
  EN TS: His stapler never gives up!
  tr TS: Zımbası asla pes etmiyor!
  EN FS: His printer never gives up!
  tr FS: Yazıcısı asla pes etmiyor!
  EN TP: a red stapler
  tr TP: kırmızı bir zımba
  EN FP: a broken stapler
  tr FP: bozuk bir zımba
26 | straw (noun): a thin tube you drink through | loc: pipet
  EN TS: His straw works super fast!
  tr TS: Pipeti turbo modda çalışıyor!
  EN FS: His spoon works super fast!
  tr FS: Kaşığı turbo modda çalışıyor!
  EN TP: a striped bendy straw
  tr TP: çizgili, bükülen bir pipet
  EN FP: a straw sun hat
  tr FP: hasır bir güneş şapkası
27 | student (noun): a person who learns at a school or college | loc: öğrenci
  EN TS: This student ices her coffee.
  tr TS: Bu öğrenci kahvesine buz atıyor.
  EN FS: This student heats her coffee.
  tr FS: Bu öğrenci kahvesini ısıtıyor.
  EN TP: a student with cold coffee
  tr TP: soğuk kahveli bir öğrenci
  EN FP: a student with hot soup
  tr FP: sıcak çorbalı bir öğrenci
28 | subject (noun): a thing you learn at school, like maths | loc: ders
  EN TS: School offers many subjects.
  tr TS: Okulda bir sürü ders var.
  EN FS: School offers two subjects.
  tr FS: Okulda sadece iki ders var.
  EN TP: many school subjects
  tr TP: bir sürü okul dersi
  EN FP: the subject of an email
  tr FP: bir e-postanın konusu
29 | telescope (noun): a tube with lenses for seeing far things | loc: teleskop
  EN TS: Her telescope shows a meteor!
  tr TS: Teleskobu bir göktaşı gösteriyor!
  EN FS: Her telescope shows a rocket!
  tr FS: Teleskobu bir roket gösteriyor!
  EN TP: a telescope on a tripod
  tr TP: tripod üstünde bir teleskop
  EN FP: a telescope on a ship
  tr FP: gemide bir teleskop
30 | textbook (noun): a book used for learning a school subject | loc: ders kitabı
  EN TS: This textbook never ends.
  tr TS: Bu ders kitabı bitmek bilmiyor.
  EN FS: This movie never ends.
  tr FS: Bu film bitmek bilmiyor.
  EN TP: a very thick textbook
  tr TP: çok kalın bir ders kitabı
  EN FP: a very thin textbook
  tr FP: çok ince bir ders kitabı
31 | university (noun): a place to study for a degree after school | loc: üniversite
  EN TS: Week five: the university is empty.
  tr TS: Beşinci hafta: üniversite bomboş.
  EN FS: Week five: the university is full.
  tr FS: Beşinci hafta: üniversite dopdolu.
  EN TP: an empty university hall
  tr TP: boş bir üniversite salonu
  EN FP: an empty university library
  tr FP: boş bir üniversite kütüphanesi
32 | word (noun): a group of letters that has a meaning | loc: kelime
  EN TS: They are playing a word game.
  tr TS: Kelime oyunu oynuyorlar.
  EN FS: They are playing a card game.
  tr FS: Kart oyunu oynuyorlar.
  EN TP: a fast word game
  tr TP: hızlı bir kelime oyunu
  EN FP: a fast card game
  tr FP: hızlı bir kart oyunu
33 | ache (noun): a continuous dull pain, like in a tooth | loc: ağrı
  EN TS: Coffee makes the ache worse!
  tr TS: Kahve ağrıyı daha da kötüleştiriyor!
  EN FS: Ice makes the ache worse!
  tr FS: Buz ağrıyı daha da kötüleştiriyor!
  EN TP: an ache in the jaw
  tr TP: çenede bir ağrı
  EN FP: an ache in the back
  tr FP: sırtta bir ağrı
34 | activity (noun): something you do for fun or exercise | loc: aktivite
  EN TS: Badminton: a great activity.
  tr TS: Badminton: harika bir aktivite.
  EN FS: Tennis: a great activity.
  tr FS: Tenis: harika bir aktivite.
  EN TP: an afternoon activity outside
  tr TP: dışarıda öğleden sonra aktivitesi
  EN FP: an activity for rainy days
  tr FP: yağmurlu günler için aktivite
35 | actor (noun): a man who plays roles in films or plays | loc: oyuncu
  EN TS: The actor deserves an Oscar!
  tr TS: Bu oyuncu Oscar'ı hak ediyor!
  EN FS: The singer deserves an Oscar!
  tr FS: Bu şarkıcı Oscar'ı hak ediyor!
  EN TP: an actor on set
  tr TP: sette bir oyuncu
  EN FP: an actor on a poster
  tr FP: afişte bir oyuncu
36 | adore (verb): to love someone or something very much | loc: tapmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She adores this cat so much!
  tr TS: Bu kediye resmen tapıyor!
  EN FS: She adores this dog so much!
  tr FS: Bu köpeğe resmen tapıyor!
  EN TP: adoring her orange cat
  tr TP: turuncu kedisine tapmak
  EN FP: adoring her orange dog
  tr FP: turuncu köpeğine tapmak
37 | advance (verb): to move forward towards a goal | loc: ilerlemek
  EN TS: The team is advancing to the goal.
  tr TS: Takım hedefe doğru ilerliyor.
  EN FS: The team is advancing to the hut.
  tr FS: Takım kulübeye doğru ilerliyor.
  EN TP: advancing to the summit
  tr TP: zirveye doğru ilerlemek
  EN FP: advancing to the final
  tr FP: finale doğru ilerlemek
38 | airport (noun): a place where planes take off and land | loc: havalimanı
  EN TS: Heavy traffic at the airport today.
  tr TS: Bugün havalimanında trafik yoğun.
  EN FS: No traffic at the airport today.
  tr FS: Bugün havalimanında hiç trafik yok.
  EN TP: a busy airport runway
  tr TP: yoğun bir havalimanı pisti
  EN FP: an airport shop
  tr FP: havalimanında bir mağaza
39 | ambulance (noun): a vehicle that takes sick people to hospital | loc: ambulans
  EN TS: An ambulance is pulling over.
  tr TS: Bir ambulans kenara çekiyor.
  EN FS: A taxi is pulling over.
  tr FS: Bir taksi kenara çekiyor.
  EN TP: an ambulance on a street
  tr TP: sokakta bir ambulans
  EN FP: an ambulance on a motorway
  tr FP: otoyolda bir ambulans
40 | answer (noun): what you say or write back to a question | loc: cevap
  EN TS: She hates the answer.
  tr TS: Cevaptan nefret ediyor.
  EN FS: She loves the answer.
  tr FS: Cevaba bayılıyor.
  EN TP: an answer from a card
  tr TP: karttan gelen bir cevap
  EN FP: an answer from a friend
  tr FP: arkadaştan gelen bir cevap
41 | argument (noun): an angry talk where people disagree | loc: tartışma
  EN TS: Just a small argument.
  tr TS: Ufak bir tartışma, o kadar.
  EN FS: Just a small kiss.
  tr FS: Ufak bir öpücük, o kadar.
  EN TP: an argument about a picture
  tr TP: bir resim yüzünden tartışma
  EN FP: an argument about money
  tr FP: para yüzünden tartışma
42 | exam (noun): a test of what you know at school | loc: sınav
  EN TS: This exam is too hard for him.
  tr TS: Bu sınav ona fazla zor!
  EN FS: This exam is too easy for him.
  tr FS: Bu sınav ona fazla kolay!
  EN TP: giving up on the exam
  tr TP: sınavdan vazgeçmek
  EN FP: passing the exam
  tr FP: sınavı geçmek
44 | anger (noun): the strong feeling of being annoyed or furious | loc: öfke
  EN TS: So much anger over a bag of flowers!
  tr TS: Bir poşet çiçek için bu ne öfke!
  EN FS: So much anger over a bag of apples!
  tr FS: Bir poşet elma için bu ne öfke!
  EN TP: anger at the flower market
  tr TP: çiçek pazarında öfke
  EN FP: anger at a traffic jam
  tr FP: trafik sıkışıklığında öfke
45 | angry (adjective): feeling very mad and upset with someone | loc: kızgın
  EN TS: She is angry at the man!
  tr TS: Kadın adama çok kızgın!
  EN FS: She is angry at the dog!
  tr FS: Kadın köpeğe çok kızgın!
  EN TP: an angry woman
  tr TP: kızgın bir kadın
  EN FP: angry about the rain
  tr FP: yağmura kızgın
46 | apple (noun): a round fruit with red or green skin | loc: elma
  EN TS: That apple looks so crispy!
  tr TS: O elma ne kadar çıtır görünüyor!
  EN FS: That pear looks so crispy!
  tr FS: O armut ne kadar çıtır görünüyor!
  EN TP: biting a red apple
  tr TP: kırmızı bir elmayı ısırmak
  EN FP: baking an apple pie
  tr FP: elmalı turta yapmak
47 | arena (noun): a big indoor hall with seats around a court | loc: arena
  EN TS: The arena is packed. Insane!
  tr TS: Arena tıklım tıklım. Çılgınlık!
  EN FS: The arena is empty. Insane!
  tr FS: Arena bomboş. Çılgınlık!
  EN TP: a packed indoor arena
  tr TP: tıklım tıklım bir kapalı arena
  EN FP: an empty indoor arena
  tr FP: bomboş bir kapalı arena
48 | arrive (verb): to reach a place at the end of a trip | loc: varmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He arrived and he is so happy!
  tr TS: Sonunda vardı ve çok mutlu!
  EN FS: He arrived and he is so sad!
  tr FS: Sonunda vardı ve çok üzgün!
  EN TP: arriving at a beach hotel
  tr TP: bir sahil oteline varmak
  EN FP: arriving at the office
  tr FP: ofise varmak
49 | arrow (noun): the thin feathered stick you shoot from a bow | loc: ok
  EN TS: Her arrow hit the bullseye.
  tr TS: Oku tam on ikiden vurdu.
  EN FS: Her arrow hit the tree.
  tr FS: Oku ağaca saplandı.
  EN TP: an arrow in the bullseye
  tr TP: hedefin ortasında bir ok
  EN FP: an arrow on the sign
  tr FP: tabeladaki bir ok
50 | jar (noun): a small glass pot with a lid | loc: kavanoz
  EN TS: The jars look like cake!
  tr TS: Kavanozlar pasta gibi görünüyor!
  EN FS: The jars look like soup!
  tr FS: Kavanozlar çorba gibi görünüyor!
  EN TP: filling small glass jars
  tr TP: küçük cam kavanozları doldurmak
  EN FP: opening small glass jars
  tr FP: küçük cam kavanozları açmak
51 | squeeze (verb): to press something firmly together with your hand | loc: sıkmak
  EN TS: Squeezing slime is so satisfying.
  tr TS: Slime sıkmak acayip rahatlatıyor.
  EN FS: Squeezing clay is so satisfying.
  tr FS: Kil sıkmak acayip rahatlatıyor.
  EN TP: squeezing colorful slime
  tr TP: rengârenk slime sıkmak
  EN FP: squeezing a lemon
  tr FP: limon sıkmak
52 | assistant (noun): a person whose job is to help someone | loc: asistan
  EN TS: The assistant does everything.
  tr TS: Her şeyi asistan yapıyor.
  EN FS: The model does everything.
  tr FS: Her şeyi model yapıyor.
  EN TP: a helpful assistant
  tr TP: yardımsever bir asistan
  EN FP: a shop assistant
  tr FP: bir mağaza asistanı
53 | athletics (noun): track-and-field sports like running and jumping | loc: atletizm
  EN TS: This is athletics at its best.
  tr TS: İşte en iyi hâliyle atletizm.
  EN FS: This is swimming at its best.
  tr FS: İşte en iyi hâliyle yüzme.
  EN TP: athletics at a stadium
  tr TP: stadyumda atletizm
  EN FP: athletics on television
  tr FP: televizyonda atletizm
54 | atm (noun): the machine in the street that gives you cash | loc: bankamatik
  EN TS: ATM cash for sunflowers!
  tr TS: Ayçiçekleri için bankamatikten nakit!
  EN FS: ATM cash for pizza!
  tr FS: Pizza için bankamatikten nakit!
  EN TP: taking cash from an ATM
  tr TP: bankamatikten para çekmek
  EN FP: an ATM keeping her card
  tr FP: kartını yutan bir bankamatik
55 | auction (noun): a public sale where the highest bidder wins | loc: müzayede
  EN TS: She won the auction.
  tr TS: Müzayedeyi kazandı.
  EN FS: She lost the auction.
  tr FS: Müzayedeyi kaybetti.
  EN TP: bidding at an auction
  tr TP: müzayedede teklif vermek
  EN FP: an auction on the internet
  tr FP: internette bir müzayede
56 | autumn (noun): the season after summer when leaves fall | loc: sonbahar
  EN TS: Autumn leaves everywhere!
  tr TS: Her yer sonbahar yaprağı!
  EN FS: Autumn snow everywhere!
  tr FS: Her yer sonbahar karı!
  EN TP: jumping into autumn leaves
  tr TP: sonbahar yapraklarına atlamak
  EN FP: autumn leaves on a tree
  tr FP: ağaçta sonbahar yaprakları
57 | back (noun): the part of a place farthest from the front | loc: arka
  EN TS: They love the back row!
  tr TS: Arka sıraya bayılıyorlar!
  EN FS: They love the front row!
  tr FS: Ön sıraya bayılıyorlar!
  EN TP: sitting at the back
  tr TP: arkada oturmak
  EN FP: the back of the stage
  tr FP: sahnenin arkası
58 | backpack (noun): a bag with two straps you wear on your shoulders | loc: sırt çantası
  EN TS: Her backpack is huge, no joke.
  tr TS: Sırt çantası devasa, şaka değil.
  EN FS: Her suitcase is huge, no joke.
  tr FS: Bavulu devasa, şaka değil.
  EN TP: packing an orange backpack
  tr TP: turuncu bir sırt çantası hazırlamak
  EN FP: a backpack at school
  tr FP: okulda bir sırt çantası
61 | backward (adverb): in the direction behind you | loc: geriye doğru
  EN TS: Why are they walking backward?
  tr TS: Neden geriye doğru yürüyorlar?
  EN FS: Why are they running backward?
  tr FS: Neden geriye doğru koşuyorlar?
  EN TP: walking backward in a park
  tr TP: parkta geriye doğru yürümek
  EN FP: falling backward in a park
  tr FP: parkta geriye doğru düşmek
62 | bag (noun): a soft container you carry things in | loc: çanta
  EN TS: The apple escaped the bag!
  tr TS: Elma çantadan kaçtı!
  EN FS: The bread escaped the bag!
  tr FS: Ekmek çantadan kaçtı!
  EN TP: packing a picnic bag
  tr TP: piknik çantası hazırlamak
  EN FP: a plastic shopping bag
  tr FP: plastik bir alışveriş poşeti
65 | baking sheet (noun): the flat metal tray you bake food on in the oven | loc: fırın tepsisi
  EN TS: Veggies on a baking sheet.
  tr TS: Fırın tepsisinde sebzeler.
  EN FS: Cookies on a baking sheet.
  tr FS: Fırın tepsisinde kurabiyeler.
  EN TP: veggies on a baking sheet
  tr TP: fırın tepsisinde sebzeler
  EN FP: cookies on a baking sheet
  tr FP: fırın tepsisinde kurabiyeler
66 | baking (noun): cooking bread or cake in an oven | loc: fırında pişirme
  EN TS: They are baking bread.
  tr TS: Fırında ekmek pişiriyorlar.
  EN FS: They are baking a cake.
  tr FS: Fırında kek pişiriyorlar.
  EN TP: baking a golden loaf
  tr TP: fırında altın rengi somun pişirmek
  EN FP: baking cookies
  tr FP: fırında kurabiye pişirmek
67 | banana (noun): a long curved yellow fruit you peel | loc: muz
  EN TS: He learned a new banana trick.
  tr TS: Yeni bir muz numarası öğrendi.
  EN FS: He learned a new apple trick.
  tr FS: Yeni bir elma numarası öğrendi.
  EN TP: peeling a banana
  tr TP: muz soymak
  EN FP: a banana in a smoothie
  tr FP: smoothie'de bir muz
68 | bandage (noun): a strip of soft cloth wrapped around a wound | loc: bandaj
  EN TS: A bandage for her wrist.
  tr TS: Bileği için bir bandaj.
  EN FS: A bandage for her knee.
  tr FS: Dizi için bir bandaj.
  EN TP: an elastic wrist bandage
  tr TP: elastik bir bilek bandajı
  EN FP: a bandage on the head
  tr FP: başta bir bandaj
69 | barbell (noun): the long metal bar with heavy plates on both ends | loc: halter
  EN TS: The barbell lost. She won!
  tr TS: Halter kaybetti. O kazandı!
  EN FS: The barbell won. She lost!
  tr FS: Halter kazandı. O kaybetti!
  EN TP: deadlifting a heavy barbell
  tr TP: ağır bir halteri yerden kaldırmak
  EN FP: bending a heavy barbell
  tr FP: ağır bir halteri bükmek
70 | barber (noun): a person who cuts men's hair and beards | loc: berber
  EN TS: This barber is a legend!
  tr TS: Bu berber efsane!
  EN FS: This baker is a legend!
  tr FS: Bu fırıncı efsane!
  EN TP: a barber trimming a beard
  tr TP: sakal düzelten bir berber
  EN FP: a barber sweeping the floor
  tr FP: yeri süpüren bir berber
71 | bark (noun): the rough outer skin of a tree trunk | loc: ağaç kabuğu
  EN TS: Birch bark is like paper.
  tr TS: Huş ağacı kabuğu kâğıt gibi.
  EN FS: Pine bark is like paper.
  tr FS: Çam ağacı kabuğu kâğıt gibi.
  EN TP: peeling birch bark
  tr TP: huş ağacı kabuğu soymak
  EN FP: a dog's loud bark
  tr FP: bir köpeğin yüksek havlaması
72 | basketball (noun): a team game of throwing a ball through a hoop | loc: basketbol
  EN TS: Basketball queen, what a dunk!
  tr TS: Basketbol kraliçesi, ne smaç ama!
  EN FS: Basketball queen, what a miss!
  tr FS: Basketbol kraliçesi, ne ıska ama!
  EN TP: a basketball dunk
  tr TP: basketbolda bir smaç
  EN FP: basketball on television
  tr FP: televizyonda basketbol
74 | bat (noun): a small flying animal that hangs upside down | loc: yarasa | translator note: FP pun (bat hitting a ball) does not travel; used a hanging bat instead
  EN TS: A bat is flying over the lake.
  tr TS: Gölün üstünde bir yarasa uçuyor.
  EN FS: A bat is flying over the city.
  tr FS: Şehrin üstünde bir yarasa uçuyor.
  EN TP: a bat flying at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında uçan bir yarasa
  EN FP: a bat hitting a ball
  tr FP: mağarada asılı bir yarasa
75 | flap (verb): to move wings up and down quickly to fly | loc: kanat çırpmak
  EN TS: Dude, the bats are flapping.
  tr TS: Kanka, yarasalar kanat çırpıyor.
  EN FS: Dude, the birds are flapping.
  tr FS: Kanka, kuşlar kanat çırpıyor.
  EN TP: flapping big wings
  tr TP: kocaman kanatlarını çırpmak
  EN FP: flapping on the cave floor
  tr FP: mağara zemininde çırpınmak
76 | battery (noun): a small object that stores power for devices | loc: pil
  EN TS: Blame the old batteries.
  tr TS: Suç eski pillerde.
  EN FS: Blame the old bulb.
  tr FS: Suç eski ampulde.
  EN TP: loading new batteries
  tr TP: yeni pil takmak
  EN FP: a battery for a car
  tr FP: bir araba aküsü
78 | beach (noun): an area of sand or stones next to the sea | loc: plaj
  EN TS: The sea took their castle on the beach.
  tr TS: Deniz, plajdaki kalelerini aldı götürdü.
  EN FS: A dog took their castle on the beach.
  tr FS: Bir köpek, plajdaki kalelerini aldı götürdü.
  EN TP: a sandcastle on the beach
  tr TP: plajda kumdan bir kale
  EN FP: a beach full of stones
  tr FP: taşlarla dolu bir plaj
79 | bear (noun): a large heavy wild animal with thick fur | loc: ayı
  EN TS: The bear is chasing a fish!
  tr TS: Ayı bir balığın peşinde!
  EN FS: The bear is chasing a duck!
  tr FS: Ayı bir ördeğin peşinde!
  EN TP: a bear in a river
  tr TP: nehirde bir ayı
  EN FP: a bear in a zoo
  tr FP: hayvanat bahçesinde bir ayı
80 | beard (noun): hair that grows on a man's chin and cheeks | loc: sakal
  EN TS: Ten years to grow that beard!
  tr TS: O sakalı uzatmak on yıl sürdü!
  EN FS: Ten days to grow that beard!
  tr FS: O sakalı uzatmak on gün sürdü!
  EN TP: a long black beard
  tr TP: uzun siyah bir sakal
  EN FP: a short grey beard
  tr FP: kısa kır bir sakal
81 | beauty (noun): the quality of being very pleasing to look at | loc: güzellik
  EN TS: Pure beauty in Santorini.
  tr TS: Santorini'de saf güzellik.
  EN FS: Pure beauty in Venice.
  tr FS: Venedik'te saf güzellik.
  EN TP: the beauty of the sunset
  tr TP: gün batımının güzelliği
  EN FP: a beauty salon in town
  tr FP: şehirde bir güzellik salonu
82 | bee (noun): a flying insect that makes honey and can sting | loc: arı
  EN TS: The bee is going back to work.
  tr TS: Arı işe geri dönüyor.
  EN FS: The ant is going back to work.
  tr FS: Karınca işe geri dönüyor.
  EN TP: a bee on a flower
  tr TP: çiçekte bir arı
  EN FP: a bee in a jar
  tr FP: kavanozda bir arı
83 | beer (noun): an alcoholic drink made from grain | loc: bira
  EN TS: The beer foam is top quality.
  tr TS: Biranın köpüğü birinci kalite.
  EN FS: The milk foam is top quality.
  tr FS: Sütün köpüğü birinci kalite.
  EN TP: pouring a golden beer
  tr TP: altın rengi bira doldurmak
  EN FP: beer at a football match
  tr FP: futbol maçında bira
84 | belt (noun): a strap you wear around your waist | loc: kemer
  EN TS: The belt saved his trousers!
  tr TS: Kemer pantolonunu kurtardı!
  EN FS: The rope saved his trousers!
  tr FS: İp pantolonunu kurtardı!
  EN TP: putting on a leather belt
  tr TP: deri kemer takmak
  EN FP: taking off a leather belt
  tr FP: deri kemer çıkarmak
85 | betray (verb): to break someone's trust after promising help | loc: ihanet etmek
  EN TS: The kid betrayed him!
  tr TS: Çocuk ona ihanet etti!
  EN FS: The dog betrayed him!
  tr FS: Köpek ona ihanet etti!
  EN TP: a betrayed farmer
  tr TP: ihanete uğramış bir çiftçi
  EN FP: a betrayed kid
  tr FP: ihanete uğramış bir çocuk
86 | bill (noun): the paper that says what you pay in a restaurant | loc: hesap
  EN TS: That bill is way too long!
  tr TS: Bu hesap fazla uzun ya!
  EN FS: That bill is way too short!
  tr FS: Bu hesap fazla kısa ya!
  EN TP: a very long bill
  tr TP: upuzun bir hesap
  EN FP: a bill in a wallet
  tr FP: cüzdanda bir hesap fişi
87 | bird (noun): an animal with feathers and wings | loc: kuş
  EN TS: The bird is giving a concert!
  tr TS: Kuş konser veriyor!
  EN FS: The cat is giving a concert!
  tr FS: Kedi konser veriyor!
  EN TP: a bird singing loudly
  tr TP: avaz avaz öten bir kuş
  EN FP: a bird in a cage
  tr FP: kafeste bir kuş
88 | dog (noun): an animal kept as a pet that barks | loc: köpek
  EN TS: The dog wants a selfie.
  tr TS: Köpek selfie istiyor.
  EN FS: The cat wants a selfie.
  tr FS: Kedi selfie istiyor.
  EN TP: a dog near the camera
  tr TP: kameranın yanında bir köpek
  EN FP: a dog near the door
  tr FP: kapının yanında bir köpek
89 | cat (noun): a small furry pet that says meow | loc: kedi
  EN TS: The black cat is jumping off.
  tr TS: Siyah kedi aşağı atlıyor.
  EN FS: The tabby cat is jumping off.
  tr FS: Tekir kedi aşağı atlıyor.
  EN TP: a cat on a tower
  tr TP: kulenin üstünde bir kedi
  EN FP: a cat under a tower
  tr FP: kulenin altında bir kedi
90 | puppy (noun): a young dog | loc: yavru köpek
  EN TS: Wait, puppies can dance?!
  tr TS: Dur, yavru köpekler dans edebiliyor mu?!
  EN FS: Wait, puppies can fly?!
  tr FS: Dur, yavru köpekler uçabiliyor mu?!
  EN TP: a puppy in the bath
  tr TP: banyoda bir yavru köpek
  EN FP: a puppy in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir yavru köpek
91 | blame (verb): to say someone is responsible for something bad | loc: suçlamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Mum is blaming the boy. The cat did it.
  tr TS: Anne oğlanı suçluyor. Oysa yapan kedi.
  EN FS: Mum is blaming the boy. The dog did it.
  tr FS: Anne oğlanı suçluyor. Oysa yapan köpek.
  EN TP: to blame the cat
  tr TP: kediyi suçlamak
  EN FP: to blame the weather
  tr FP: havayı suçlamak
92 | blanket (noun): a large warm cover for a bed | loc: battaniye
  EN TS: One blanket, two people.
  tr TS: Tek battaniye, iki kişi.
  EN FS: One blanket, three people.
  tr FS: Tek battaniye, üç kişi.
  EN TP: sharing a big blanket
  tr TP: büyük bir battaniyeyi paylaşmak
  EN FP: sharing a big pizza
  tr FP: büyük bir pizzayı paylaşmak
93 | blender (noun): the machine whose blades mix food into a drink | loc: karıştırıcı
  EN TS: The blender did it!
  tr TS: Hepsini karıştırıcı yaptı!
  EN FS: The toaster did it!
  tr FS: Hepsini tost makinesi yaptı!
  EN TP: a smoothie in a blender
  tr TP: karıştırıcıda smoothie
  EN FP: a blender full of soup
  tr FP: çorba dolu bir karıştırıcı
94 | blink (verb): to quickly close and open your eyes | loc: göz kırpmak
  EN TS: He blinked first. She won!
  tr TS: İlk oğlan göz kırptı. Kız kazandı!
  EN FS: She blinked first. He won!
  tr FS: İlk kız göz kırptı. Oğlan kazandı!
  EN TP: blinking first
  tr TP: ilk göz kırpan olmak
  EN FP: blinking at the sun
  tr FP: güneşe göz kırpmak
95 | blush (noun): the pink face powder you brush onto your cheeks | loc: allık
  EN TS: She is putting on pink blush.
  tr TS: Pembe allık sürüyor.
  EN FS: She is putting on blue blush.
  tr FS: Mavi allık sürüyor.
  EN TP: sweeping on pink blush
  tr TP: pembe allık sürmek
  EN FP: blushing from shame
  tr FP: utançtan kızarmak
96 | board (verb): to get on a plane, ship or train as a passenger | loc: binmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is boarding the plane.
  tr TS: Uçağa biniyor.
  EN FS: She is boarding the train.
  tr FS: Trene biniyor.
  EN TP: boarding the plane
  tr TP: uçağa binmek
  EN FP: boarding the bus
  tr FP: otobüse binmek
97 | boil (verb): to heat a liquid until it bubbles | loc: kaynamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The water is boiling.
  tr TS: Su kaynıyor.
  EN FS: The milk is boiling.
  tr FS: Süt kaynıyor.
  EN TP: water at a rolling boil
  tr TP: fokur fokur kaynayan su
  EN FP: milk at a rolling boil
  tr FP: fokur fokur kaynayan süt
98 | hammock (noun): a hanging bed of cloth or net you lie in | loc: hamak
  EN TS: She is reading in a hammock.
  tr TS: Hamakta kitap okuyor.
  EN FS: She is sleeping in a hammock.
  tr FS: Hamakta uyuyor.
  EN TP: reading in a hammock
  tr TP: hamakta kitap okumak
  EN FP: sleeping in a hammock
  tr FP: hamakta uyumak
99 | book (noun): a set of printed pages inside a cover to read | loc: kitap
  EN TS: She finished the whole book!
  tr TS: Koca kitabı bitirdi!
  EN FS: She finished the whole cake!
  tr FS: Koca pastayı bitirdi!
  EN TP: reading a green book
  tr TP: yeşil bir kitap okumak
  EN FP: a book on a train
  tr FP: trende bir kitap
100 | boots (noun): strong shoes that cover your ankle or leg | loc: botlar
  EN TS: These boots love mud.
  tr TS: Bu botlar çamura bayılıyor.
  EN FS: These sandals love mud.
  tr FS: Bu sandaletler çamura bayılıyor.
  EN TP: boots in the mud
  tr TP: çamurda botlar
  EN FP: boots in a shop
  tr FP: mağazada botlar
101 | bored (adjective): tired and unhappy because nothing is fun | loc: sıkılmış
  EN TS: Ugh. She is so bored.
  tr TS: Of. Kız fena sıkılmış.
  EN FS: Ugh. He is so bored.
  tr FS: Of. Oğlan fena sıkılmış.
  EN TP: bored of waiting
  tr TP: beklemekten sıkılmış
  EN FP: bored at a party
  tr FP: partide sıkılmış
102 | boredom (noun): the feeling of having nothing interesting to do | loc: can sıkıntısı
  EN TS: Boredom level: a wet sock on his head.
  tr TS: Can sıkıntısı seviyesi: kafasında ıslak çorap.
  EN FS: Boredom level: a wet hat on his head.
  tr FS: Can sıkıntısı seviyesi: kafasında ıslak şapka.
  EN TP: boredom in a laundromat
  tr TP: çamaşırhanede can sıkıntısı
  EN FP: boredom in a classroom
  tr FP: sınıfta can sıkıntısı
103 | laundromat (noun): a shop of washing machines you pay to use | loc: çamaşırhane
  EN TS: Night at the laundromat. Ugh!
  tr TS: Çamaşırhanede gece. Of!
  EN FS: Night at the library. Ugh!
  tr FS: Kütüphanede gece. Of!
  EN TP: waiting at a laundromat
  tr TP: çamaşırhanede beklemek
  EN FP: working at a laundromat
  tr FP: çamaşırhanede çalışmak
104 | bottom (noun): the ground under the sea, a lake or a river | loc: dip | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: A stone from the sea bottom!
  tr TS: Deniz dibinden bir taş!
  EN FS: A shell from the sea bottom!
  tr FS: Deniz dibinden bir deniz kabuğu!
  EN TP: a stone from the bottom
  tr TP: dipten çıkan bir taş
  EN FP: the bottom of a glass
  tr FP: bir bardağın dibi
105 | bow (noun): a curved weapon with a string that shoots arrows | loc: yay
  EN TS: Her bow never misses.
  tr TS: Yayı asla ıskalamıyor.
  EN FS: Her bow always misses.
  tr FS: Yayı hep ıskalıyor.
  EN TP: drawing a wooden bow
  tr TP: tahta bir yayı germek
  EN FP: a bow and a sword
  tr FP: bir yay ve bir kılıç
106 | aim (verb): to point a weapon carefully at your target | loc: nişan almak
  EN TS: He is aiming at the hay bale.
  tr TS: Saman balyasına nişan alıyor.
  EN FS: He is aiming at a tree.
  tr FS: Bir ağaca nişan alıyor.
  EN TP: aiming a bamboo bow
  tr TP: bambu yayla nişan almak
  EN FP: aiming a water gun
  tr FP: su tabancasıyla nişan almak
107 | bowl (noun): a round deep dish for soup or cereal | loc: kase
  EN TS: The bowl is his cup now.
  tr TS: Kase artık onun bardağı.
  EN FS: The pot is his cup now.
  tr FS: Tencere artık onun bardağı.
  EN TP: drinking from a bowl
  tr TP: kaseden içmek
  EN FP: washing a blue bowl
  tr FP: mavi bir kase yıkamak
110 | box (noun): a container with flat sides, often of cardboard | loc: kutu
  EN TS: The cat is "helping" with the boxes.
  tr TS: Kedi kutulara "yardım ediyor".
  EN FS: The dog is "helping" with the boxes.
  tr FS: Köpek kutulara "yardım ediyor".
  EN TP: a big packed box
  tr TP: ağzına kadar dolu büyük bir kutu
  EN FP: a box of chocolates
  tr FP: bir kutu çikolata
111 | boxing (noun): a sport where two people fight with their fists | loc: boks
  EN TS: Boxing makes her so happy.
  tr TS: Boks onu çok mutlu ediyor.
  EN FS: Tennis makes her so happy.
  tr FS: Tenis onu çok mutlu ediyor.
  EN TP: boxing with red gloves
  tr TP: kırmızı eldivenlerle boks
  EN FP: boxing up old clothes
  tr FP: eski kıyafetleri kutulamak
112 | brave (adjective): not afraid to do something scary or hard | loc: cesur
  EN TS: The little girl is brave, her parents not so much.
  tr TS: Küçük kız cesur, ailesi pek değil.
  EN FS: The little boy is brave, his parents not so much.
  tr FS: Küçük oğlan cesur, ailesi pek değil.
  EN TP: a brave little girl
  tr TP: cesur küçük bir kız
  EN FP: a brave knight in armour
  tr FP: zırhlı, cesur bir şövalye
114 | bread (noun): a baked food made from flour and water | loc: ekmek
  EN TS: The bread is still so warm.
  tr TS: Ekmek hâlâ sıcacık.
  EN FS: The bread is still so frozen.
  tr FS: Ekmek hâlâ buz gibi donmuş.
  EN TP: warm bread from the oven
  tr TP: fırından sıcak ekmek
  EN FP: bread from the supermarket
  tr FP: süpermarketten ekmek
115 | breakfast (noun): the first meal of the day | loc: kahvaltı
  EN TS: The rooster came for breakfast too.
  tr TS: Horoz da kahvaltıya geldi.
  EN FS: The dog came for breakfast too.
  tr FS: Köpek de kahvaltıya geldi.
  EN TP: breakfast in the garden
  tr TP: bahçede kahvaltı
  EN FP: breakfast in bed
  tr FP: yatakta kahvaltı
116 | breaking (noun): smashing something into pieces | loc: kırmak
  EN TS: Breaking stuff is art now!
  tr TS: Bir şeyler kırmak artık sanat!
  EN FS: Painting stuff is art now!
  tr FS: Bir şeyler boyamak artık sanat!
  EN TP: breaking blue tiles
  tr TP: mavi fayansları kırmak
  EN FP: breaking a window
  tr FP: cam kırmak
117 | mosaic (noun): a picture made of small tiles set side by side | loc: mozaik
  EN TS: They made a plate mosaic.
  tr TS: Tabaklardan mozaik yaptılar.
  EN FS: They made a cup mosaic.
  tr FS: Fincanlardan mozaik yaptılar.
  EN TP: a flower mosaic from plates
  tr TP: tabaklardan çiçek mozaiği
  EN FP: a mosaic of glass tiles
  tr FP: cam karolardan bir mozaik
118 | building (noun): the work of making something from parts | loc: monte etmek
  EN TS: Building done, time for a high-five!
  tr TS: Monte ettik, bitti. Çak bir beşlik!
  EN FS: Building done, time for a group hug!
  tr FS: Monte ettik, bitti. Hadi grup sarılması!
  EN TP: building a raised planter
  tr TP: yükseltilmiş bir saksı monte etmek
  EN FP: a tall office building
  tr FP: yüksek bir ofis binası
119 | bulb (noun): the glass part of a lamp that gives light | loc: ampul
  EN TS: Bulb replaced. Task complete.
  tr TS: Ampul değişti. Görev tamam.
  EN FS: Fuse replaced. Task complete.
  tr FS: Sigorta değişti. Görev tamam.
  EN TP: screwing in a new bulb
  tr TP: yeni bir ampul takmak
  EN FP: a bulb in the garden
  tr FP: bahçede bir çiçek soğanı
120 | burger (noun): a round piece of meat served in a bread roll | loc: burger
  EN TS: That burger needs both hands!
  tr TS: Bu burger iki el ister!
  EN FS: That pizza needs both hands!
  tr FS: Bu pizza iki el ister!
  EN TP: a tall cheese burger
  tr TP: kat kat peynirli bir burger
  EN FP: a burger in a box
  tr FP: kutuda bir burger
121 | burn (verb): to damage food or skin with too much heat | loc: yakmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He burned the pancake. Oops!
  tr TS: Pankeki yaktı. Eyvah!
  EN FS: He burned the toast. Oops!
  tr FS: Tostu yaktı. Eyvah!
  EN TP: a burned black pancake
  tr TP: kapkara yanmış bir pankek
  EN FP: a burned black steak
  tr FP: kapkara yanmış bir biftek
122 | bus stop (noun): a spot on a street to wait for public transport | loc: otobüs durağı
  EN TS: They are waiting forever at the bus stop.
  tr TS: Otobüs durağında sonsuza dek bekliyorlar.
  EN FS: They are waiting forever at the train station.
  tr FS: Tren istasyonunda sonsuza dek bekliyorlar.
  EN TP: waiting at a bus stop
  tr TP: otobüs durağında beklemek
  EN FP: waiting at a taxi rank
  tr FP: taksi durağında beklemek
123 | bush (noun): a plant like a small low tree with many branches | loc: çalı
  EN TS: A bird flew out of the bush!
  tr TS: Çalıdan bir kuş fırladı!
  EN FS: A cat jumped out of the bush!
  tr FS: Çalıdan bir kedi fırladı!
  EN TP: picking from the bushes
  tr TP: çalılardan meyve toplamak
  EN FP: hiding behind the bushes
  tr FP: çalıların arkasına saklanmak
124 | spread (verb): to push soft food over a surface in a thin layer | loc: sürmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is spreading a brick of butter.
  tr TS: Koca bir kalıp tereyağı sürüyor.
  EN FS: She is spreading a brick of cheese.
  tr FS: Koca bir kalıp peynir sürüyor.
  EN TP: spreading butter on bread
  tr TP: ekmeğe tereyağı sürmek
  EN FP: spreading a picnic blanket
  tr FP: piknik örtüsü sermek
125 | butter (noun): a soft yellow food made from cream | loc: tereyağı
  EN TS: The butter broke the bread!
  tr TS: Tereyağı ekmeği kırdı!
  EN FS: The jam broke the bread!
  tr FS: Reçel ekmeği kırdı!
  EN TP: butter too hard to spread
  tr TP: sürülemeyecek kadar sert tereyağı
  EN FP: butter in a hot pan
  tr FP: sıcak tavada tereyağı
126 | button (noun): a small round thing that fastens clothes | loc: düğme
  EN TS: He needs help with the buttons.
  tr TS: Düğmeler için yardıma ihtiyacı var.
  EN FS: He needs help with the shoelaces.
  tr FS: Ayakkabı bağcıkları için yardıma ihtiyacı var.
  EN TP: a crooked row of buttons
  tr TP: yamuk bir sıra düğme
  EN FP: pressing a lift button
  tr FP: asansör düğmesine basmak
127 | cactus (noun): a desert plant covered in sharp spines | loc: kaktüs
  EN TS: This cactus is way too sharp!
  tr TS: Bu kaktüs fazla dikenli ya!
  EN FS: This palm is way too sharp!
  tr FS: Bu palmiye fazla dikenli ya!
  EN TP: sharp cactus spines
  tr TP: sivri kaktüs dikenleri
  EN FP: a cactus in a pot
  tr FP: saksıda bir kaktüs
128 | cake (noun): a sweet baked food, often for birthdays | loc: pasta
  EN TS: Her birthday cake has berries.
  tr TS: Doğum günü pastasında orman meyveleri var.
  EN FS: Her birthday cake has bananas.
  tr FS: Doğum günü pastasında muz var.
  EN TP: a cream birthday cake
  tr TP: kremalı bir doğum günü pastası
  EN FP: a chocolate wedding cake
  tr FP: çikolatalı bir düğün pastası
129 | calculator (noun): a small device that does maths for you | loc: hesap makinesi
  EN TS: Five plus three? He needs a calculator.
  tr TS: Beş artı üç mü? Hesap makinesi lazım.
  EN FS: Nine plus nine? He needs a calculator.
  tr FS: Dokuz artı dokuz mu? Hesap makinesi lazım.
  EN TP: a big desk calculator
  tr TP: büyük bir masa hesap makinesi
  EN FP: a calculator on a phone
  tr FP: telefonda hesap makinesi
130 | calendar (noun): a chart showing the days, weeks and months | loc: takvim
  EN TS: A heart on her calendar? Love!
  tr TS: Takviminde kalp mi? Aşk bu!
  EN FS: A star on her calendar? Love!
  tr FS: Takviminde yıldız mı? Aşk bu!
  EN TP: a heart on the calendar
  tr TP: takvimde bir kalp
  EN FP: a calendar on the desk
  tr FP: masada bir takvim
131 | call (verb): to phone someone and talk to them | loc: aramak
  EN TS: This is the best call ever.
  tr TS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi arama bu.
  EN FS: This is the worst call ever.
  tr FS: Gelmiş geçmiş en kötü arama bu.
  EN TP: a happy phone call
  tr TP: mutlu bir telefon araması
  EN FP: a call for help
  tr FP: yardım için bir arama
132 | calories (noun): the energy units in food you burn off by moving | loc: kaloriler
  EN TS: Cake calories win!
  tr TS: Pastanın kalorileri kazanır!
  EN FS: Salad calories win!
  tr FS: Salatanın kalorileri kazanır!
  EN TP: burning off calories
  tr TP: kalorileri yakmak
  EN FP: counting calories on a label
  tr FP: etikette kalorileri saymak
133 | camel (noun): a desert animal with one or two humps | loc: deve
  EN TS: The camel is taking a break.
  tr TS: Deve mola veriyor.
  EN FS: The camel is taking a bath.
  tr FS: Deve banyo yapıyor.
  EN TP: a camel in the desert
  tr TP: çölde bir deve
  EN FP: a camel in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir deve
134 | camping (noun): sleeping outdoors in a tent for fun | loc: kamp
  EN TS: Camping in a pine forest, so cool.
  tr TS: Çam ormanında kamp, çok iyi.
  EN FS: Camping on a sandy beach, so cool.
  tr FS: Kumsalda kamp, çok iyi.
  EN TP: camping in a forest
  tr TP: ormanda kamp yapmak
  EN FP: camping in the garden
  tr FP: bahçede kamp yapmak
135 | cancel (verb): to say a planned meeting or event is off | loc: iptal etmek
  EN TS: His plans got cancelled. Yes!
  tr TS: Planları iptal edildi. Yaşasın!
  EN FS: His flight got cancelled. Yes!
  tr FS: Uçuşu iptal edildi. Yaşasın!
  EN TP: cancelling plans tonight
  tr TP: bu akşamki planları iptal etmek
  EN FP: cancelling a gym membership
  tr FP: spor salonu üyeliğini iptal etmek
136 | candle (noun): a stick of wax with a string you light | loc: mum
  EN TS: Candlelight for two? So cute.
  tr TS: İki kişilik mum ışığı mı? Çok tatlı.
  EN FS: Lamplight for two? So cute.
  tr FS: İki kişilik lamba ışığı mı? Çok tatlı.
  EN TP: a candle on the table
  tr TP: masada bir mum
  EN FP: a candle on a cake
  tr FP: pastada bir mum
137 | canyon (noun): a deep narrow valley with steep rock walls | loc: kanyon
  EN TS: The canyon shouts back!
  tr TS: Kanyon geri bağırıyor!
  EN FS: The forest shouts back!
  tr FS: Orman geri bağırıyor!
  EN TP: a narrow slot canyon
  tr TP: dar bir kanyon
  EN FP: a canyon from above
  tr FP: yukarıdan bir kanyon
138 | cap (noun): a soft hat with a stiff part at the front | loc: şapka
  EN TS: A cap, finally some shade.
  tr TS: Şapka, nihayet biraz gölge.
  EN FS: A tree, finally some shade.
  tr FS: Ağaç, nihayet biraz gölge.
  EN TP: a coral cap for shade
  tr TP: gölge için mercan rengi şapka
  EN FP: a cap on a bottle
  tr FP: şişede bir kapak
139 | capital (noun): the city where a country's government is | loc: başkent
  EN TS: He found the capital!
  tr TS: Başkenti buldu!
  EN FS: He found the ocean!
  tr FS: Okyanusu buldu!
  EN TP: the capital below the hill
  tr TP: tepenin altındaki başkent
  EN FP: a capital letter
  tr FP: bir büyük harf
140 | carpet (noun): a thick soft cover for a floor | loc: halı
  EN TS: Their new carpet is so soft!
  tr TS: Yeni halıları çok yumuşak!
  EN FS: Their new sofa is so soft!
  tr FS: Yeni kanepeleri çok yumuşak!
  EN TP: a soft green carpet
  tr TP: yumuşak yeşil bir halı
  EN FP: a soft green blanket
  tr FP: yumuşak yeşil bir battaniye
141 | carrot (noun): a long orange vegetable that grows underground | loc: havuç
  EN TS: This carrot can feed a horse.
  tr TS: Bu havuç bir atı doyurur.
  EN FS: This potato can feed a horse.
  tr FS: Bu patates bir atı doyurur.
  EN TP: a giant carrot
  tr TP: dev bir havuç
  EN FP: a giant potato
  tr FP: dev bir patates
142 | castle (noun): a large old stone building with strong walls | loc: kale
  EN TS: It is so big! A real castle.
  tr TS: Çok büyük! Gerçek bir kale.
  EN FS: It is so small! A real castle.
  tr FS: Çok küçük! Gerçek bir kale.
  EN TP: a castle on a lake
  tr TP: göl kenarında bir kale
  EN FP: a castle on a hill
  tr FP: tepede bir kale
144 | catch (verb): to take hold of something moving through the air | loc: yakalamak
  EN TS: He caught the red ball.
  tr TS: Kırmızı topu yakaladı.
  EN FS: He caught the blue ball.
  tr FS: Mavi topu yakaladı.
  EN TP: to catch a red ball
  tr TP: kırmızı bir topu yakalamak
  EN FP: to catch a cold
  tr FP: soğuk algınlığına yakalanmak
145 | catching (noun): taking hold of something thrown to you | loc: yakalama
  EN TS: Their catching is really good.
  tr TS: Yakalamaları gerçekten çok iyi.
  EN FS: Their kicking is really good.
  tr FS: Şutları gerçekten çok iyi.
  EN TP: catching an orange ball
  tr TP: turuncu bir topu yakalama
  EN FP: catching a cold
  tr FP: soğuk algınlığına yakalanma
146 | caterpillar (noun): the young worm-like form of a butterfly | loc: tırtıl
  EN TS: This caterpillar has a five-year plan.
  tr TS: Bu tırtılın beş yıllık planı var.
  EN FS: This snail has a five-year plan.
  tr FS: Bu salyangozun beş yıllık planı var.
  EN TP: a caterpillar on a leaf
  tr TP: yaprakta bir tırtıl
  EN FP: a caterpillar in a jar
  tr FP: kavanozda bir tırtıl
147 | cave (noun): a large hole in rock you can go into | loc: mağara
  EN TS: They are walking into a dark cave!
  tr TS: Karanlık bir mağaraya giriyorlar!
  EN FS: They are walking into a dark house!
  tr FS: Karanlık bir eve giriyorlar!
  EN TP: walking into a dark cave
  tr TP: karanlık bir mağaraya girmek
  EN FP: sleeping in a cave
  tr FP: mağarada uyumak
148 | celebrate (verb): to do something fun for a special day | loc: kutlamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: They are celebrating!
  tr TS: Kutluyorlar!
  EN FS: They are studying!
  tr FS: Ders çalışıyorlar!
  EN TP: celebrating a birthday
  tr TP: doğum günü kutlamak
  EN FP: celebrating a wedding
  tr FP: düğün kutlamak
149 | censor (verb): to officially hide parts of a text from readers | loc: sansürlemek
  EN TS: His letter got censored. Rude!
  tr TS: Mektubu sansürlendi. Ayıp!
  EN FS: His letter got burned. Rude!
  tr FS: Mektubu yakıldı. Ayıp!
  EN TP: a censored letter
  tr TP: sansürlenmiş bir mektup
  EN FP: a censored film
  tr FP: sansürlenmiş bir film
150 | cereal (noun): breakfast food made from grain, eaten with milk | loc: mısır gevreği
  EN TS: He eats cereal without milk!
  tr TS: Mısır gevreğini sütsüz yiyor!
  EN FS: He eats cereal without a bowl!
  tr FS: Mısır gevreğini kasesiz yiyor!
  EN TP: dry cereal in a bowl
  tr TP: kasede kuru mısır gevreği
  EN FP: cereal in a box
  tr FP: kutuda mısır gevreği
151 | chain (noun): a row of metal rings joined together | loc: zincir
  EN TS: A chain secures the gate.
  tr TS: Kapı zincirle kilitli.
  EN FS: A rope secures the gate.
  tr FS: Kapı halatla kilitli.
  EN TP: a chain around a gate
  tr TP: kapıya dolanmış bir zincir
  EN FP: a chain around a bike
  tr FP: bisiklete dolanmış bir zincir
152 | chair (noun): a seat for one person, with a back | loc: sandalye
  EN TS: Best chair ever! Full circle!
  tr TS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi sandalye! Tam tur!
  EN FS: Best sofa ever! Full circle!
  tr FS: Gelmiş geçmiş en iyi kanepe! Tam tur!
  EN TP: a new swivel chair
  tr TP: yeni bir döner sandalye
  EN FP: a new rocking chair
  tr FP: yeni bir sallanan sandalye
153 | champagne (noun): a sparkling white wine opened at celebrations | loc: şampanya
  EN TS: The champagne cork is flying!
  tr TS: Şampanya mantarı uçuyor!
  EN FS: The champagne glass is flying!
  tr FS: Şampanya kadehi uçuyor!
  EN TP: pouring champagne
  tr TP: şampanya doldurmak
  EN FP: spraying champagne on a podium
  tr FP: podyumda şampanya püskürtmek
154 | charger (noun): a device that puts power back into a battery | loc: şarj aleti
  EN TS: The charger was in the drawer!
  tr TS: Şarj aleti çekmecedeymiş!
  EN FS: The charger was in the fridge!
  tr FS: Şarj aleti buzdolabındaymış!
  EN TP: plugging in a charger
  tr TP: şarj aletini prize takmak
  EN FP: a charger for a car
  tr FP: bir araba şarj aleti
155 | cheese (noun): a food made from milk, often yellow | loc: peynir
  EN TS: The cheese stretches forever!
  tr TS: Peynir bitmek bilmeden uzuyor!
  EN FS: The bread stretches forever!
  tr FS: Ekmek bitmek bilmeden uzuyor!
  EN TP: stretchy melted cheese
  tr TP: uzayan erimiş peynir
  EN FP: cheese on a pizza
  tr FP: pizzada peynir
156 | chest (noun): the front upper part of the body | loc: göğüs
  EN TS: His medal is on his chest.
  tr TS: Madalyası göğsünde.
  EN FS: His medal is on his head.
  tr FS: Madalyası başında.
  EN TP: hands on his chest
  tr TP: elleri göğsünde
  EN FP: hands on his head
  tr FP: elleri başında
157 | chewing gum (noun): a soft sweet you keep biting but never swallow | loc: sakız
  EN TS: Her chewing gum is so pink.
  tr TS: Sakızı çok pembe.
  EN FS: Her chewing gum is so green.
  tr FS: Sakızı çok yeşil.
  EN TP: blowing chewing gum bubbles
  tr TP: sakızla balon şişirmek
  EN FP: chewing gum under a desk
  tr FP: sıranın altında sakız
158 | chewing (noun): biting food again and again in your mouth | loc: çiğneme
  EN TS: The chewing is hard work!
  tr TS: Çiğnemek resmen ağır iş!
  EN FS: The walking is hard work!
  tr FS: Yürümek resmen ağır iş!
  EN TP: chewing sticky toffee
  tr TP: yapışkan karamela çiğnemek
  EN FP: chewing a pencil
  tr FP: kalem çiğnemek
159 | chicken (noun): a farm bird kept for its eggs and meat | loc: tavuk
  EN TS: The chicken laid an egg!
  tr TS: Tavuk yumurtladı!
  EN FS: The chicken ate an egg!
  tr FS: Tavuk yumurta yedi!
  EN TP: a chicken in a coop
  tr TP: kümeste bir tavuk
  EN FP: a chicken on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta tavuk
160 | nest (noun): the straw bed a bird makes to sit on its eggs | loc: kuş yuvası | translator note: loc "kuş yuvası" is unnatural for a hen; used "yuva"
  EN TS: Fact: the hen is in her nest.
  tr TS: Bilgi: tavuk, yuvasında oturuyor.
  EN FS: Fact: the duck is in her nest.
  tr FS: Bilgi: ördek, yuvasında oturuyor.
  EN TP: a hen in her nest
  tr TP: yuvasındaki bir tavuk
  EN FP: a hen building a nest
  tr FP: yuva yapan bir tavuk
161 | chicken drumstick (noun): the lower leg of a cooked chicken that you eat | loc: tavuk baget
  EN TS: The dog wants that chicken drumstick.
  tr TS: Köpek o tavuk bageti istiyor.
  EN FS: The cat wants that chicken drumstick.
  tr FS: Kedi o tavuk bageti istiyor.
  EN TP: biting a chicken drumstick
  tr TP: tavuk baget ısırmak
  EN FP: a drumstick for a drum
  tr FP: bir davul bageti
162 | chocolate (noun): a sweet brown food made from cocoa | loc: çikolata
  EN TS: He is melting chocolate.
  tr TS: Çikolata eritiyor.
  EN FS: He is melting butter.
  tr FS: Tereyağı eritiyor.
  EN TP: melting chocolate in a pot
  tr TP: tencerede çikolata eritmek
  EN FP: a chocolate birthday cake
  tr FP: çikolatalı doğum günü pastası
163 | chopsticks (noun): a pair of thin wooden rods for picking up food | loc: yemek çubukları
  EN TS: He can use chopsticks now!
  tr TS: Artık yemek çubuklarını kullanabiliyor!
  EN FS: He can use a fork now!
  tr FS: Artık çatal kullanabiliyor!
  EN TP: holding chopsticks
  tr TP: yemek çubuklarını tutmak
  EN FP: breaking chopsticks
  tr FP: yemek çubuklarını kırmak
164 | dumpling (noun): a small steamed ball of dough with a filling | loc: dumpling
  EN TS: Whole dumpling, one bite!
  tr TS: Koca dumpling, tek lokma!
  EN FS: Whole pizza, one bite!
  tr FS: Koca pizza, tek lokma!
  EN TP: a whole soup dumpling
  tr TP: koca bir çorbalı dumpling
  EN FP: making dumplings at home
  tr FP: evde dumpling yapmak
165 | cinema (noun): a place where you watch films on a big screen | loc: sinema
  EN TS: They are at the cinema.
  tr TS: Sinemadalar.
  EN FS: They are at the zoo.
  tr FS: Hayvanat bahçesindeler.
  EN TP: a dark cinema
  tr TP: karanlık bir sinema
  EN FP: a cinema ticket
  tr FP: bir sinema bileti
166 | circle (noun): a perfectly round shape | loc: daire
  EN TS: They form a perfect circle.
  tr TS: Kusursuz bir daire oluşturuyorlar.
  EN FS: They form a perfect line.
  tr FS: Kusursuz bir sıra oluşturuyorlar.
  EN TP: a human circle
  tr TP: insanlardan bir daire
  EN FP: a circle of chairs
  tr FP: sandalyelerden bir daire
167 | citizen (noun): someone who legally belongs to a country | loc: vatandaş
  EN TS: A good citizen votes and cleans.
  tr TS: İyi vatandaş oy verir ve temizlik yapar.
  EN FS: A good citizen votes and dances.
  tr FS: İyi vatandaş oy verir ve dans eder.
  EN TP: a proud citizen voting
  tr TP: oy veren gururlu bir vatandaş
  EN FP: a citizen paying taxes
  tr FP: vergi ödeyen bir vatandaş
168 | citizenship (noun): the legal status of belonging to a country | loc: vatandaşlık
  EN TS: They got their citizenship!
  tr TS: Vatandaşlıklarını aldılar!
  EN FS: They got their medals!
  tr FS: Madalyalarını aldılar!
  EN TP: receiving citizenship papers
  tr TP: vatandaşlık belgelerini almak
  EN FP: losing citizenship
  tr FP: vatandaşlığı kaybetmek
169 | clay (noun): soft wet earth shaped and baked into pots | loc: kil
  EN TS: The clay became a bowl.
  tr TS: Kil bir kaseye dönüştü.
  EN FS: The clay became a vase.
  tr FS: Kil bir vazoya dönüştü.
  EN TP: a wet lump of clay
  tr TP: ıslak bir kil topağı
  EN FP: a clay tennis court
  tr FP: toprak bir tenis kortu
170 | cleaner (noun): a person whose job is to tidy and wash rooms | loc: temizlikçi
  EN TS: The cleaner fixed this mess!
  tr TS: Bu dağınıklığı temizlikçi halletti!
  EN FS: The cook fixed this mess!
  tr FS: Bu dağınıklığı aşçı halletti!
  EN TP: a hotel cleaner
  tr TP: bir otel temizlikçisi
  EN FP: a window cleaner
  tr FP: bir cam silici
171 | correct (adjective): right, with no mistakes | loc: doğru
  EN TS: The boy is correct, the girl is not.
  tr TS: Oğlan doğru söylüyor, kız değil.
  EN FS: The girl is correct, the boy is not.
  tr FS: Kız doğru söylüyor, oğlan değil.
  EN TP: a correct answer
  tr TP: doğru bir cevap
  EN FP: a correct spelling
  tr FP: doğru bir yazım
172 | cleats (noun): sports shoes with studs for grip on grass | loc: krampon
  EN TS: His cleats grip the wet grass.
  tr TS: Kramponları ıslak çimi kavrıyor.
  EN FS: His cleats grip the wet sand.
  tr FS: Kramponları ıslak kumu kavrıyor.
  EN TP: lacing up the cleats
  tr TP: kramponları bağlamak
  EN FP: lacing up the skates
  tr FP: patenleri bağlamak
173 | cliff (noun): a high steep wall of rock | loc: uçurum
  EN TS: They are lying on a cliff.
  tr TS: Bir uçurumun üstünde uzanıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are lying on a beach.
  tr FS: Bir kumsalda uzanıyorlar.
  EN TP: the edge of a cliff
  tr TP: uçurumun kenarı
  EN FP: climbing a cliff
  tr FP: uçuruma tırmanmak
174 | clinic (noun): a small medical center you visit without staying | loc: klinik
  EN TS: They are at a clinic desk.
  tr TS: Klinik bankosundalar.
  EN FS: They are at a hotel desk.
  tr FS: Otel bankosundalar.
  EN TP: a visit to the clinic
  tr TP: kliniğe bir ziyaret
  EN FP: a visit to the gym
  tr FP: spor salonuna bir ziyaret
175 | clock (noun): a device on a wall or table showing the time | loc: saat
  EN TS: They are hanging a clock.
  tr TS: Bir saat asıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are hanging a picture.
  tr FS: Bir tablo asıyorlar.
  EN TP: a round kitchen clock
  tr TP: yuvarlak bir mutfak saati
  EN FP: a round kitchen table
  tr FP: yuvarlak bir mutfak masası
176 | coal (noun): the black rock that you burn for heat | loc: kömür
  EN TS: Coal in, fire up!
  tr TS: Kömürü at, ateşi yak!
  EN FS: Wood in, fire up!
  tr FS: Odunu at, ateşi yak!
  EN TP: loading coal into the stove
  tr TP: sobaya kömür atmak
  EN FP: a deep coal mine
  tr FP: derin bir kömür madeni
177 | coat (noun): a warm jacket you wear over your clothes outside | loc: palto
  EN TS: Coat on. Winter, do your worst.
  tr TS: Palto giyildi. Kış, elinden geleni ardına koyma.
  EN FS: Gloves on. Winter, do your worst.
  tr FS: Eldivenler giyildi. Kış, elinden geleni ardına koyma.
  EN TP: buttoning a long coat
  tr TP: uzun bir paltoyu iliklemek
  EN FP: hanging up a long coat
  tr FP: uzun bir paltoyu asmak
178 | cocktail (noun): a mixed drink shaken with fruit and ice | loc: kokteyl
  EN TS: The cocktail has an umbrella.
  tr TS: Kokteylin şemsiyesi var.
  EN FS: The cocktail has a flag.
  tr FS: Kokteylin bayrağı var.
  EN TP: a layered orange cocktail
  tr TP: katmanlı turuncu bir kokteyl
  EN FP: a cocktail party dress
  tr FP: bir kokteyl elbisesi
179 | coffee (noun): a hot dark drink made from roasted beans | loc: kahve
  EN TS: Coffee works like magic!
  tr TS: Kahve sihir gibi çalışıyor!
  EN FS: Water works like magic!
  tr FS: Su sihir gibi çalışıyor!
  EN TP: coffee from a moka pot
  tr TP: moka potta kahve
  EN FP: coffee from a machine
  tr FP: makineden kahve
180 | cold (adjective): having a low temperature, not warm | loc: soğuk
  EN TS: So cold! Her hand says no.
  tr TS: Çok soğuk! Eli hayır diyor.
  EN FS: So hot! Her hand says no.
  tr FS: Çok sıcak! Eli hayır diyor.
  EN TP: a cold frozen lake
  tr TP: buz tutmuş soğuk bir göl
  EN FP: a cold drink
  tr FP: soğuk bir içecek
181 | collar (noun): the part of a shirt that goes around your neck | loc: yaka
  EN TS: Collar up? No way!
  tr TS: Yaka yukarı mı? Olmaz öyle şey!
  EN FS: Sleeves up? No way!
  tr FS: Kollar yukarı mı? Olmaz öyle şey!
  EN TP: a collar popped up
  tr TP: dikilmiş bir yaka
  EN FP: a dog's collar
  tr FP: bir köpek tasması
182 | comb (noun): a flat tool with thin teeth to tidy your hair | loc: tarak
  EN TS: He has an orange comb.
  tr TS: Turuncu bir tarağı var.
  EN FS: He has a blue comb.
  tr FS: Mavi bir tarağı var.
  EN TP: an orange plastic comb
  tr TP: turuncu plastik bir tarak
  EN FP: a comb for a dog
  tr FP: bir köpek tarağı
183 | comfort (verb): to make a sad person feel better | loc: teselli etmek
  EN TS: Her friend is comforting her.
  tr TS: Arkadaşı onu teselli ediyor.
  EN FS: Her friend is ignoring her.
  tr FS: Arkadaşı onu görmezden geliyor.
  EN TP: comforting a crying friend
  tr TP: ağlayan bir arkadaşı teselli etmek
  EN FP: comforting a crying baby
  tr FP: ağlayan bir bebeği teselli etmek
184 | command (verb): to give someone an order they must obey | loc: emretmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She commands, they run.
  tr TS: O emrediyor, onlar koşuyor.
  EN FS: She commands, they sleep.
  tr FS: O emrediyor, onlar uyuyor.
  EN TP: commanding a line of trainees
  tr TP: sıradaki kursiyerlere emretmek
  EN FP: commanding a ship
  tr FP: bir gemiye komuta etmek
185 | commute (verb): to travel regularly between home and work | loc: işe gidip gelmek
  EN TS: He commutes by tram. Yawn.
  tr TS: İşe tramvayla gidip geliyor. Of, sıkıcı.
  EN FS: He commutes by boat. Yawn.
  tr FS: İşe vapurla gidip geliyor. Of, sıkıcı.
  EN TP: commuting by tram
  tr TP: tramvayla işe gidip gelmek
  EN FP: commuting by bike
  tr FP: bisikletle işe gidip gelmek
186 | concert (noun): a show where musicians play live music | loc: konser
  EN TS: Even the dog is at the concert!
  tr TS: Köpek bile konserde!
  EN FS: Even the cat is at the concert!
  tr FS: Kedi bile konserde!
  EN TP: an open-air concert
  tr TP: bir açık hava konseri
  EN FP: a concert hall
  tr FP: bir konser salonu
187 | confused (adjective): not able to understand what is going on | loc: kafası karışık
  EN TS: The instructions confused her.
  tr TS: Talimatlar kafasını karıştırdı.
  EN FS: The map confused her.
  tr FS: Harita kafasını karıştırdı.
  EN TP: confused by the instructions
  tr TP: talimatlar yüzünden kafası karışık
  EN FP: confused about the date
  tr FP: tarih konusunda kafası karışık
188 | constitution (noun): the basic written law of a country | loc: anayasa
  EN TS: The constitution says no.
  tr TS: Anayasa hayır diyor.
  EN FS: The constitution says yes.
  tr FS: Anayasa evet diyor.
  EN TP: reading the constitution
  tr TP: anayasayı okumak
  EN FP: writing a new constitution
  tr FP: yeni bir anayasa yazmak
189 | convoy (noun): a group of vehicles traveling together | loc: konvoy
  EN TS: Three cars form a convoy.
  tr TS: Üç araba bir konvoy oluşturuyor.
  EN FS: Five cars form a convoy.
  tr FS: Beş araba bir konvoy oluşturuyor.
  EN TP: a convoy of sports cars
  tr TP: spor arabalardan bir konvoy
  EN FP: a convoy of trucks
  tr FP: kamyonlardan bir konvoy
190 | cookie (noun): a small flat sweet baked snack | loc: kurabiye
  EN TS: She is dunking her cookie.
  tr TS: Kurabiyesini banıyor.
  EN FS: She is dunking her bread.
  tr FS: Ekmeğini banıyor.
  EN TP: dunking a cookie
  tr TP: kurabiye banmak
  EN FP: baking a cookie cake
  tr FP: kurabiyeli pasta yapmak
191 | corkscrew (noun): a tool with a metal spiral for pulling corks | loc: tirbuşon
  EN TS: He is using a corkscrew.
  tr TS: Tirbuşon kullanıyor.
  EN FS: He is using a knife.
  tr FS: Bıçak kullanıyor.
  EN TP: twisting in a corkscrew
  tr TP: tirbuşonu burarak sokmak
  EN FP: a corkscrew in a drawer
  tr FP: çekmecede bir tirbuşon
192 | corner (noun): the place where two streets meet | loc: köşe
  EN TS: They are hiding round the corner!
  tr TS: Köşenin arkasında saklanıyorlar!
  EN FS: They are hiding under the table!
  tr FS: Masanın altında saklanıyorlar!
  EN TP: around the corner
  tr TP: köşeyi dönünce
  EN FP: a corner shop
  tr FP: köşedeki bakkal
193 | corrupt (adjective): using power dishonestly to get money | loc: yozlaşmış
  EN TS: What a corrupt official!
  tr TS: Ne yozlaşmış bir yetkili!
  EN FS: What an honest official!
  tr FS: Ne dürüst bir yetkili!
  EN TP: a corrupt official
  tr TP: yozlaşmış bir yetkili
  EN FP: a corrupt computer file
  tr FP: bozulmuş bir bilgisayar dosyası
194 | cotton (noun): a soft white plant fiber used to make cloth | loc: pamuk
  EN TS: The cotton is so soft.
  tr TS: Pamuk çok yumuşak.
  EN FS: The wool is so soft.
  tr FS: Yün çok yumuşak.
  EN TP: picking soft cotton
  tr TP: yumuşak pamuk toplamak
  EN FP: buying cotton sheets
  tr FP: pamuklu çarşaf almak
195 | coughing (noun): loud bursts of air from your throat when ill | loc: öksürme
  EN TS: Honey tea stops the coughing.
  tr TS: Ballı çay öksürmeyi durduruyor.
  EN FS: Cold beer stops the coughing.
  tr FS: Soğuk bira öksürmeyi durduruyor.
  EN TP: coughing in an armchair
  tr TP: koltukta öksürmek
  EN FP: coughing at a concert
  tr FP: konserde öksürmek
196 | courage (noun): being able to act even when you are afraid | loc: cesaret
  EN TS: Courage got her across!
  tr TS: Onu karşıya cesareti geçirdi!
  EN FS: A zip line got her across!
  tr FS: Onu karşıya zipline geçirdi!
  EN TP: crossing with courage
  tr TP: cesaretle karşıya geçmek
  EN FP: the courage to jump down
  tr FP: aşağı atlama cesareti
197 | cow (noun): a large farm animal that gives milk | loc: inek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The cow is being milked.
  tr TS: İnek sağılıyor.
  EN FS: The goat is being milked.
  tr FS: Keçi sağılıyor.
  EN TP: a cow with a bell
  tr TP: çıngıraklı bir inek
  EN FP: a cow with a hat
  tr FP: şapkalı bir inek
198 | cramp (noun): a sudden painful tightening of a muscle | loc: kramp
  EN TS: A cramp stopped her run.
  tr TS: Bir kramp koşusunu yarıda kesti.
  EN FS: A cramp stopped her swim.
  tr FS: Bir kramp yüzmesini yarıda kesti.
  EN TP: a cramp in the calf
  tr TP: baldırda bir kramp
  EN FP: a cramp in the hand
  tr FP: elde bir kramp
199 | crash (verb): to hit something hard with a loud noise | loc: çarpmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is crashing into everyone!
  tr TS: Herkese çarpıyor!
  EN FS: He is crashing into a wall!
  tr FS: Duvara çarpıyor!
  EN TP: crashing bumper cars
  tr TP: çarpışan arabalarla birbirine çarpmak
  EN FP: crashing a real car
  tr FP: gerçek bir arabayla çarpmak
200 | cream (noun): the thick fatty part of milk | loc: krema
  EN TS: He is holding cream over his head!
  tr TS: Kremayı başının üstünde tutuyor!
  EN FS: He is holding soup over his head!
  tr FS: Çorbayı başının üstünde tutuyor!
  EN TP: stiff whipped cream
  tr TP: kaskatı çırpılmış krema
  EN FP: a cream for the face
  tr FP: bir yüz kremi
201 | crocodile (noun): a big reptile with a long body and sharp teeth | loc: timsah
  EN TS: Nice teeth, crocodile!
  tr TS: Güzel dişler, timsah!
  EN FS: Nice teeth, lion!
  tr FS: Güzel dişler, aslan!
  EN TP: a crocodile with open jaws
  tr TP: ağzı açık bir timsah
  EN FP: a crocodile with closed eyes
  tr FP: gözleri kapalı bir timsah
202 | cross (verb): to go from one side of a road to the other | loc: geçmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Phone down. Now he can cross.
  tr TS: Telefon cebe girdi. Artık karşıya geçebilir.
  EN FS: Phone down. Now he can swim.
  tr FS: Telefon cebe girdi. Artık yüzebilir.
  EN TP: to cross the street safely
  tr TP: caddeden güvenle karşıya geçmek
  EN FP: to cross your fingers
  tr FP: parmaklarını çaprazlamak
203 | cruise (noun): a holiday trip on a large ship | loc: gemi turu
  EN TS: Their cruise has dolphins too!
  tr TS: Gemi turlarında yunuslar da var!
  EN FS: Their cruise has sharks too!
  tr FS: Gemi turlarında köpekbalıkları da var!
  EN TP: a cruise to tropical islands
  tr TP: tropik adalara gemi turu
  EN FP: a cruise to Antarctica
  tr FP: Antarktika'ya gemi turu
204 | crutch (noun): a stick under the arm that helps you walk | loc: koltuk değneği
  EN TS: He is racing on his crutches!
  tr TS: Koltuk değnekleriyle yarışıyor!
  EN FS: He is racing on his bike!
  tr FS: Bisikletiyle yarışıyor!
  EN TP: walking on two crutches
  tr TP: iki koltuk değneğiyle yürümek
  EN FP: leaning on one crutch
  tr FP: tek koltuk değneğine yaslanmak
205 | crying (noun): letting tears fall because you feel sad | loc: ağlama
  EN TS: Sad film. Both are crying.
  tr TS: Hüzünlü film. İkisi de ağlamaya başladı.
  EN FS: Sad film. Both are sleeping.
  tr FS: Hüzünlü film. İkisi de uyumaya başladı.
  EN TP: crying at a sad film
  tr TP: hüzünlü bir filmde ağlamak
  EN FP: crying at a wedding
  tr FP: bir düğünde ağlamak
206 | cucumber (noun): a long green vegetable often eaten in salads | loc: salatalık
  EN TS: Her cucumber spa is cheap.
  tr TS: Salatalıklı spası bedava gibi.
  EN FS: Her lemon spa is cheap.
  tr FS: Limonlu spası bedava gibi.
  EN TP: cucumber slices on the eyes
  tr TP: gözlerde salatalık dilimleri
  EN FP: cucumber in a sandwich
  tr FP: sandviçte salatalık
207 | cup (noun): a small container with a handle for hot drinks | loc: fincan
  EN TS: Her cup is small and green.
  tr TS: Fincanı küçük ve yeşil.
  EN FS: Her cup is small and blue.
  tr FS: Fincanı küçük ve mavi.
  EN TP: a small green cup
  tr TP: küçük yeşil bir fincan
  EN FP: a cup of coffee
  tr FP: bir fincan kahve
209 | curious (adjective): wanting to know what is going on | loc: meraklı
  EN TS: Curious cat, no privacy.
  tr TS: Meraklı kedi, mahremiyet sıfır.
  EN FS: Curious dog, no privacy.
  tr FS: Meraklı köpek, mahremiyet sıfır.
  EN TP: a curious cat peeking in
  tr TP: içeri bakan meraklı bir kedi
  EN FP: a curious dog peeking in
  tr FP: içeri bakan meraklı bir köpek
210 | customer (noun): a person who buys things in a shop | loc: müşteri
  EN TS: She is a happy customer.
  tr TS: O mutlu bir müşteri.
  EN FS: She is a sad customer.
  tr FS: O üzgün bir müşteri.
  EN TP: a customer at the counter
  tr TP: tezgâhta bir müşteri
  EN FP: a customer at the door
  tr FP: kapıda bir müşteri
211 | customs (noun): the border check on what you bring into a country | loc: gümrük
  EN TS: "Just one fruit!" Customs said no.
  tr TS: "Tek bir meyve!" Gümrük hayır dedi.
  EN FS: "Just one shoe!" Customs said no.
  tr FS: "Tek bir ayakkabı!" Gümrük hayır dedi.
  EN TP: a fruit at customs
  tr TP: gümrükte bir meyve
  EN FP: a fruit at the market
  tr FP: pazarda bir meyve
212 | dancer (noun): a person who moves to music as art or as a job | loc: dansçı
  EN TS: This dancer has great moves.
  tr TS: Bu dansçının hareketleri harika.
  EN FS: This singer has great moves.
  tr FS: Bu şarkıcının hareketleri harika.
  EN TP: a hip-hop dancer
  tr TP: bir hip-hop dansçısı
  EN FP: a ballet dancer on stage
  tr FP: sahnede bir bale dansçısı
213 | dancing (noun): moving your body to the beat of music | loc: dans etme
  EN TS: His dancing is really smooth.
  tr TS: Dans etme tarzı çok akıcı.
  EN FS: His singing is really smooth.
  tr FS: Şarkı söyleme tarzı çok akıcı.
  EN TP: salsa dancing in the kitchen
  tr TP: mutfakta salsa dansı
  EN FP: dancing in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda dans etmek
214 | dangerous (adjective): likely to hurt you or cause harm | loc: tehlikeli
  EN TS: This ice is dangerous!
  tr TS: Bu buz tehlikeli!
  EN FS: This ice is safe!
  tr FS: Bu buz güvenli!
  EN TP: dangerous thin ice
  tr TP: tehlikeli ince buz
  EN FP: dangerous ice on a road
  tr FP: yolda tehlikeli buzlanma
215 | darkness (noun): the state when there is no light | loc: karanlık
  EN TS: The room fell into darkness.
  tr TS: Oda karanlığa gömüldü.
  EN FS: The garden fell into darkness.
  tr FS: Bahçe karanlığa gömüldü.
  EN TP: a kitchen in darkness
  tr TP: karanlıkta bir mutfak
  EN FP: darkness in a cinema
  tr FP: sinemada karanlık
217 | dart (noun): a small pointed arrow you throw at a round board | loc: dart oku
  EN TS: Her dart is near the bullseye!
  tr TS: Dart oku tam merkeze çok yakın!
  EN FS: Her dart is near the door!
  tr FS: Dart oku kapıya çok yakın!
  EN TP: throwing a turquoise dart
  tr TP: turkuaz bir dart oku atmak
  EN FP: throwing a turquoise ball
  tr FP: turkuaz bir top atmak
218 | declare (verb): to announce something officially in public | loc: ilan etmek
  EN TS: She declared the bridge open.
  tr TS: Köprüyü resmen açık ilan etti.
  EN FS: She declared the school open.
  tr FS: Okulu resmen açık ilan etti.
  EN TP: declaring the bridge open
  tr TP: köprüyü açık ilan etmek
  EN FP: declaring goods at customs
  tr FP: gümrükte eşya beyan etmek
219 | deer (noun): a wild forest animal, the males have antlers | loc: geyik
  EN TS: The deer is shouting at us!
  tr TS: Geyik bize bağırıyor!
  EN FS: The deer is running at us!
  tr FS: Geyik bize doğru koşuyor!
  EN TP: a deer in the fog
  tr TP: sisin içinde bir geyik
  EN FP: a deer in the snow
  tr FP: karda bir geyik
220 | defrost (verb): to let frozen food become soft again | loc: buzunu çözmek
  EN TS: He defrosted the fish.
  tr TS: Balığın buzunu çözdü.
  EN FS: He defrosted the chicken.
  tr FS: Tavuğun buzunu çözdü.
  EN TP: a defrosted fish fillet
  tr TP: buzu çözülmüş bir balık fileto
  EN FP: defrosting the car window
  tr FP: araba camının buzunu çözmek
221 | degree (noun): the qualification you get for finishing university | loc: üniversite diploması
  EN TS: She is holding up her degree.
  tr TS: Üniversite diplomasını havaya kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: She is holding up her baby.
  tr FS: Bebeğini havaya kaldırıyor.
  EN TP: holding up her degree
  tr TP: üniversite diplomasını havaya kaldırmak
  EN FP: studying for her degree
  tr FP: üniversite diploması için ders çalışmak
222 | delay (noun): when something happens later than planned | loc: gecikme
  EN TS: This delay is taking forever.
  tr TS: Bu gecikme bir ömür sürdü.
  EN FS: This train is taking forever.
  tr FS: Bu tren yolculuğu bir ömür sürdü.
  EN TP: a delay at the station
  tr TP: istasyonda bir gecikme
  EN FP: a delay at the airport
  tr FP: havalimanında bir gecikme
223 | delivery (noun): bringing food or goods to someone's door | loc: teslimat
  EN TS: The delivery is finally here!
  tr TS: Teslimat sonunda geldi!
  EN FS: The plumber is finally here!
  tr FS: Tesisatçı sonunda geldi!
  EN TP: a food delivery
  tr TP: bir yemek teslimatı
  EN FP: a parcel delivery
  tr FP: bir kargo teslimatı
224 | designing (noun): planning how something will look before making it | loc: tasarlamak
  EN TS: Designing a chair is fun.
  tr TS: Sandalye tasarlamak eğlenceli.
  EN FS: Designing a table is fun.
  tr FS: Masa tasarlamak eğlenceli.
  EN TP: designing a model chair
  tr TP: maket bir sandalye tasarlamak
  EN FP: designing a dress
  tr FP: bir elbise tasarlamak
225 | desk (noun): a table you sit at to work or study | loc: çalışma masası
  EN TS: Her desk is ready. The cat agrees.
  tr TS: Çalışma masası hazır. Kedi de onaylıyor.
  EN FS: Her desk is ready. The dog agrees.
  tr FS: Çalışma masası hazır. Köpek de onaylıyor.
  EN TP: a clean desk for work
  tr TP: iş için temiz bir çalışma masası
  EN FP: a clean desk for dinner
  tr FP: akşam yemeği için temiz bir masa
226 | despair (noun): the feeling of losing all hope | loc: umutsuzluk
  EN TS: Empty case, total despair.
  tr TS: Kutu boş, umutsuzluk tavan.
  EN FS: Full case, total despair.
  tr FS: Kutu dolu, umutsuzluk tavan.
  EN TP: despair in an empty tunnel
  tr TP: boş bir tünelde umutsuzluk
  EN FP: despair after an exam
  tr FP: sınavdan sonra umutsuzluk
227 | diamond (noun): a very hard, sparkling stone used in jewelry | loc: elmas
  EN TS: That diamond is on fire!
  tr TS: O elmas alev alev parlıyor!
  EN FS: That ruby is on fire!
  tr FS: O yakut alev alev parlıyor!
  EN TP: a sparkling diamond ring
  tr TP: pırıl pırıl bir elmas yüzük
  EN FP: a diamond necklace
  tr FP: bir elmas kolye
228 | dinner (noun): the main meal of the evening | loc: akşam yemeği
  EN TS: Dinner by the sea is not bad.
  tr TS: Deniz kenarında akşam yemeği hiç fena değil.
  EN FS: Dinner by the pool is not bad.
  tr FS: Havuz kenarında akşam yemeği hiç fena değil.
  EN TP: dinner on the terrace
  tr TP: terasta akşam yemeği
  EN FP: dinner in the kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta akşam yemeği
229 | diploma (noun): the official paper you get for finishing a course | loc: diploma
  EN TS: He got his diploma at last!
  tr TS: Sonunda diplomasını aldı!
  EN FS: He got his medal at last!
  tr FS: Sonunda madalyasını aldı!
  EN TP: receiving a diploma
  tr TP: diploma almak
  EN FP: framing a diploma
  tr FP: diplomayı çerçevelemek
230 | director (noun): the person who runs a film and directs the actors | loc: yönetmen
  EN TS: The director wants it slower.
  tr TS: Yönetmen daha yavaş istiyor.
  EN FS: The director wants it faster.
  tr FS: Yönetmen daha hızlı istiyor.
  EN TP: a director shouting cut
  tr TP: "kestik" diye bağıran yönetmen
  EN FP: a director of a bank
  tr FP: bir banka müdürü
231 | disappoint (verb): to make someone sad by not doing what they hoped | loc: hayal kırıklığına uğratmak
  EN TS: He disappointed her badly.
  tr TS: Onu fena hayal kırıklığına uğrattı.
  EN FS: He disappointed his boss.
  tr FS: Patronunu fena hayal kırıklığına uğrattı.
  EN TP: disappointing his partner
  tr TP: partnerini hayal kırıklığına uğratmak
  EN FP: disappointing test results
  tr FP: hayal kırıklığı yaratan test sonuçları
232 | disappointed (adjective): sad because something was not as good as you hoped | loc: hayal kırıklığına uğramış
  EN TS: He is a little disappointed.
  tr TS: Adam biraz hayal kırıklığına uğramış.
  EN FS: She is a little disappointed.
  tr FS: Kadın biraz hayal kırıklığına uğramış.
  EN TP: a disappointed customer
  tr TP: hayal kırıklığına uğramış bir müşteri
  EN FP: disappointed by the rain
  tr FP: yağmur yüzünden hayal kırıklığına uğramış
233 | dislocate (verb): to push a bone out of its normal place in a joint | loc: yerinden çıkarmak
  EN TS: He dislocated his shoulder.
  tr TS: Omzunu yerinden çıkardı.
  EN FS: He dislocated his knee.
  tr FS: Dizini yerinden çıkardı.
  EN TP: a dislocated shoulder
  tr TP: yerinden çıkmış bir omuz
  EN FP: a dislocated finger
  tr FP: yerinden çıkmış bir parmak
234 | dissolve (verb): to mix into a liquid and disappear | loc: çözünmek
  EN TS: The sugar dissolved. Magic!
  tr TS: Şeker çözündü. Sihir!
  EN FS: The salt dissolved. Magic!
  tr FS: Tuz çözündü. Sihir!
  EN TP: a sugar cube dissolving
  tr TP: çözünen bir kesme şeker
  EN FP: a pill dissolving
  tr FP: çözünen bir hap
235 | fetch (verb): to run after something and bring it back | loc: getirmek
  EN TS: Dude, he fetched the ball.
  tr TS: Kanka, topu getirdi.
  EN FS: Dude, he fetched a stick.
  tr FS: Kanka, bir sopa getirdi.
  EN TP: fetching a red ball
  tr TP: kırmızı bir top getirmek
  EN FP: fetching a red apple
  tr FP: kırmızı bir elma getirmek
236 | dolphin (noun): a smart sea animal that jumps and plays | loc: yunus
  EN TS: The dolphin is racing a boat.
  tr TS: Yunus bir tekneyle yarışıyor.
  EN FS: The dolphin is racing a shark.
  tr FS: Yunus bir köpekbalığıyla yarışıyor.
  EN TP: a dolphin beside a boat
  tr TP: teknenin yanında bir yunus
  EN FP: a dolphin in a pool
  tr FP: havuzda bir yunus
237 | donkey (noun): a small grey animal with long ears | loc: eşek
  EN TS: The donkey is rolling in the dust like it's a spa.
  tr TS: Eşek tozda yuvarlanıyor, spa sanki.
  EN FS: The donkey is rolling in the mud like it's a spa.
  tr FS: Eşek çamurda yuvarlanıyor, spa sanki.
  EN TP: a donkey rolling in dust
  tr TP: tozda yuvarlanan bir eşek
  EN FP: a donkey carrying a bag
  tr FP: çanta taşıyan bir eşek
238 | steal (verb): to take something that is not yours | loc: çalmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He stole a drink!
  tr TS: Bir içecek çaldı!
  EN FS: He stole a shoe!
  tr FS: Bir ayakkabı çaldı!
  EN TP: stealing a customer's drink
  tr TP: müşterinin içeceğini çalmak
  EN FP: stealing a customer's parcel
  tr FP: müşterinin kargosunu çalmak
239 | doubt (verb): to not be sure that something is true | loc: şüphe etmek
  EN TS: He doubts the ring is gold.
  tr TS: Yüzüğün altın olduğundan şüphe ediyor.
  EN FS: He is sure the ring is gold.
  tr FS: Yüzüğün altın olduğundan emin.
  EN TP: doubting a gold ring
  tr TP: altın bir yüzükten şüphe etmek
  EN FP: doubting his girlfriend
  tr FP: kız arkadaşından şüphe etmek
240 | draw (noun): a result where neither side wins | loc: beraberlik
  EN TS: Grandma calls it a draw.
  tr TS: Büyükanne buna beraberlik diyor.
  EN FS: The dog calls it a draw.
  tr FS: Köpek buna beraberlik diyor.
  EN TP: an arm-wrestling draw
  tr TP: bilek güreşinde beraberlik
  EN FP: a draw in football
  tr FP: futbolda beraberlik
241 | drawing (noun): making pictures with a pencil or pen | loc: çizim
  EN TS: The drawing looks just like the real harbour!
  tr TS: Çizim gerçek limana tıpatıp benziyor!
  EN FS: The drawing looks just like the real mountain!
  tr FS: Çizim gerçek dağa tıpatıp benziyor!
  EN TP: a pencil drawing of houses
  tr TP: evlerin karakalem çizimi
  EN FP: a drawing on a wall
  tr FP: duvarda bir çizim
242 | dress (noun): a one-piece item of clothing with a skirt | loc: elbise
  EN TS: Spin again! Great dress!
  tr TS: Bir daha dön! Elbise harika!
  EN FS: Spin again! Great hat!
  tr FS: Bir daha dön! Şapka harika!
  EN TP: a red summer dress
  tr TP: kırmızı bir yazlık elbise
  EN FP: a red wedding dress
  tr FP: kırmızı bir gelinlik
243 | dressing (noun): putting on your clothes | loc: giyinme
  EN TS: Winter dressing is hard work!
  tr TS: Kışın giyinmek resmen ağır iş!
  EN FS: Summer dressing is hard work!
  tr FS: Yazın giyinmek resmen ağır iş!
  EN TP: fast dressing for winter
  tr TP: kış için hızlı giyinmek
  EN FP: dressing a salad
  tr FP: salataya sos koymak
244 | drink (noun): a liquid you swallow, like juice or water | loc: içecek
  EN TS: One drink was not enough.
  tr TS: Bir içecek yetmedi.
  EN FS: One sandwich was not enough.
  tr FS: Bir sandviç yetmedi.
  EN TP: a fresh orange drink
  tr TP: taze portakallı bir içecek
  EN FP: a hot drink
  tr FP: sıcak bir içecek
245 | drinking (noun): taking liquid into your mouth and swallowing | loc: içme | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is drinking like a camel!
  tr TS: Deve gibi içiyor!
  EN FS: She is eating like a camel!
  tr FS: Deve gibi yiyor!
  EN TP: drinking from a steel bottle
  tr TP: çelik şişeden su içmek
  EN FP: drinking at a party
  tr FP: partide içmek
246 | driving (noun): controlling a car as it moves along | loc: araba sürme
  EN TS: That driving is so smooth.
  tr TS: Araba sürmesi çok akıcı.
  EN FS: That cycling is so smooth.
  tr FS: Bisiklet sürmesi çok akıcı.
  EN TP: driving along the coast
  tr TP: sahil boyunca araba sürmek
  EN FP: driving through the city
  tr FP: şehir içinde araba sürmek
247 | drop (verb): to let something fall | loc: düşürmek
  EN TS: He is dropping the apple for science.
  tr TS: Bilim için elmayı düşürüyor.
  EN FS: He is throwing the apple for science.
  tr FS: Bilim için elmayı fırlatıyor.
  EN TP: to drop an apple
  tr TP: bir elma düşürmek
  EN FP: to drop a glass
  tr FP: bir bardak düşürmek
248 | dropper (noun): a small glass tube with a bulb for giving drops | loc: damlalık
  EN TS: She is dosing with a dropper.
  tr TS: Damlalıkla doz ayarlıyor.
  EN FS: She is dosing with a syringe.
  tr FS: Şırıngayla doz ayarlıyor.
  EN TP: squeezing a glass dropper
  tr TP: cam damlalığı sıkmak
  EN FP: dropping a glass dropper
  tr FP: cam damlalığı düşürmek
250 | duck (noun): a water bird with a flat beak | loc: ördek
  EN TS: The duck is doing a headstand!
  tr TS: Ördek amuda kalkıyor!
  EN FS: The swan is doing a headstand!
  tr FS: Kuğu amuda kalkıyor!
  EN TP: a duck on a pond
  tr TP: gölette bir ördek
  EN FP: a duck in the rain
  tr FP: yağmurda bir ördek
251 | dumbbell (noun): a short bar with a weight at each end | loc: dambıl
  EN TS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's sipping coffee.
  tr TS: Adam dambıl kaldırıyor, kız kahvesini yudumluyor.
  EN FS: He's curling the dumbbell, she's eating cake.
  tr FS: Adam dambıl kaldırıyor, kız pasta yiyor.
  EN TP: curling a heavy dumbbell
  tr TP: ağır bir dambıl kaldırmak
  EN FP: a dumbbell on the sofa
  tr FP: kanepede bir dambıl
252 | dust (noun): tiny dry bits of dirt that cover surfaces | loc: toz
  EN TS: He blew a huge cloud of dust!
  tr TS: Kocaman bir toz bulutu üfledi!
  EN FS: He blew a huge cloud of smoke!
  tr FS: Kocaman bir duman bulutu üfledi!
  EN TP: a cloud of dust
  tr TP: bir toz bulutu
  EN FP: a cloud of smoke
  tr FP: bir duman bulutu
253 | dusting (noun): wiping fine dirt off shelves and furniture | loc: toz alma
  EN TS: Dusting is a team sport here.
  tr TS: Burada toz almak takım sporu.
  EN FS: Cooking is a team sport here.
  tr FS: Burada yemek yapmak takım sporu.
  EN TP: dusting a lampshade
  tr TP: abajurda toz alma
  EN FP: dusting a cake with sugar
  tr FP: pastaya pudra şekeri serpmek
254 | earth (noun): the planet we live on | loc: Dünya
  EN TS: They are spinning the Earth!
  tr TS: Dünya'yı döndürüyorlar!
  EN FS: They are painting the Earth!
  tr FS: Dünya'yı boyuyorlar!
  EN TP: the Earth on a desk
  tr TP: masada bir Dünya küresi
  EN FP: a map of the Earth
  tr FP: bir Dünya haritası
255 | east (noun): the direction where the sun comes up | loc: doğu
  EN TS: The sun rises in the east.
  tr TS: Güneş doğudan doğar.
  EN FS: The sun rises in the west.
  tr FS: Güneş batıdan doğar.
  EN TP: facing the east at dawn
  tr TP: şafakta doğuya bakmak
  EN FP: going east by train
  tr FP: trenle doğuya gitmek
256 | eating (noun): putting food in your mouth and swallowing it | loc: yemek yeme
  EN TS: All that eating made them full.
  tr TS: O kadar yemek yemek onları doyurdu.
  EN FS: All that eating made them hungry.
  tr FS: O kadar yemek yemek onları acıktırdı.
  EN TP: eating noodle soup
  tr TP: noodle çorbası yemek
  EN FP: eating a sandwich
  tr FP: sandviç yemek
258 | edge (noun): the line or border where a surface or object ends | loc: kenar
  EN TS: Careful, that is the edge!
  tr TS: Dikkat, orası kenar!
  EN FS: Careful, that is the hole!
  tr FS: Dikkat, orası çukur!
  EN TP: the edge of the dock
  tr TP: iskelenin kenarı
  EN FP: the edge of a knife
  tr FP: bir bıçağın kenarı
259 | eerie (adjective): strange and a bit scary, in a quiet unsettling way | loc: ürkütücü
  EN TS: The sky is eerie. Aliens?
  tr TS: Gökyüzü ürkütücü. Uzaylılar mı?
  EN FS: The sea is eerie. Aliens?
  tr FS: Deniz ürkütücü. Uzaylılar mı?
  EN TP: an eerie red glow
  tr TP: ürkütücü kırmızı bir parıltı
  EN FP: an eerie silent forest
  tr FP: ürkütücü, sessiz bir orman
260 | egg (noun): an oval thing laid by a hen, used as food | loc: yumurta
  EN TS: He is frying an egg.
  tr TS: Yumurta kızartıyor.
  EN FS: He is boiling an egg.
  tr FS: Yumurta haşlıyor.
  EN TP: a fried egg on toast
  tr TP: kızarmış ekmekte sahanda yumurta
  EN FP: a boiled egg
  tr FP: haşlanmış bir yumurta
261 | electrician (noun): a worker who fixes wires and power in homes | loc: elektrikçi
  EN TS: The electrician is the hero!
  tr TS: Kahraman elektrikçi!
  EN FS: The plumber is the hero!
  tr FS: Kahraman tesisatçı!
  EN TP: an electrician at work
  tr TP: iş başında bir elektrikçi
  EN FP: an electrician on a roof
  tr FP: çatıda bir elektrikçi
262 | elephant (noun): a huge grey animal with a long trunk | loc: fil
  EN TS: Free shower for the elephant.
  tr TS: Fil için bedava duş.
  EN FS: Free shower for the giraffe.
  tr FS: Zürafa için bedava duş.
  EN TP: an elephant at a waterhole
  tr TP: su birikintisinde bir fil
  EN FP: an elephant in a circus
  tr FP: sirkte bir fil
263 | emerge (verb): to come into view from inside or under something | loc: ortaya çıkmak
  EN TS: She is emerging from the lake!
  tr TS: Gölün içinden ortaya çıkıyor!
  EN FS: She is emerging from the snow!
  tr FS: Karın içinden ortaya çıkıyor!
  EN TP: emerging from the water
  tr TP: suyun içinden ortaya çıkmak
  EN FP: emerging from a cave
  tr FP: mağaradan ortaya çıkmak
264 | emotion (noun): a strong feeling like joy or sadness | loc: duygu
  EN TS: So much emotion at arrivals!
  tr TS: Gelen yolcu salonunda ne duygular!
  EN FS: So much emotion at departures!
  tr FS: Giden yolcu salonunda ne duygular!
  EN TP: full of emotion
  tr TP: duygu dolu
  EN FP: hiding her emotion
  tr FP: duygularını saklamak
265 | employee (noun): a person who works for a company or a boss | loc: çalışan
  EN TS: The employee got paid!
  tr TS: Çalışan maaşını aldı!
  EN FS: The employee got fired!
  tr FS: Çalışan kovuldu!
  EN TP: a happy employee
  tr TP: mutlu bir çalışan
  EN FP: a new employee
  tr FP: yeni bir çalışan
266 | energy (noun): the strength to be active and do things | loc: enerji
  EN TS: She has way too much energy!
  tr TS: Kızın enerjisi fazla ya!
  EN FS: He has way too much energy!
  tr FS: Oğlanın enerjisi fazla ya!
  EN TP: full of energy
  tr TP: enerji dolu
  EN FP: energy from the sun
  tr FP: güneşten gelen enerji
267 | engineer (noun): a person who plans and builds machines | loc: mühendis
  EN TS: The engineer made a robot arm.
  tr TS: Mühendis bir robot kol yaptı.
  EN FS: The engineer made a robot dog.
  tr FS: Mühendis bir robot köpek yaptı.
  EN TP: an engineer in a lab
  tr TP: laboratuvarda bir mühendis
  EN FP: an engineer on a bridge
  tr FP: köprüde bir mühendis
268 | envelope (noun): a paper cover you put a letter in | loc: zarf
  EN TS: They sealed the envelope and kissed it.
  tr TS: Zarfı kapatıp öptüler.
  EN FS: They sealed the envelope and burned it.
  tr FS: Zarfı kapatıp yaktılar.
  EN TP: a sealed paper envelope
  tr TP: kapalı bir kâğıt zarf
  EN FP: an open paper envelope
  tr FP: açık bir kâğıt zarf
269 | envy (noun): wanting what someone else has | loc: kıskançlık
  EN TS: Pure envy on the bus.
  tr TS: Otobüste saf kıskançlık.
  EN FS: Pure envy on the train.
  tr FS: Trende saf kıskançlık.
  EN TP: envy of a cyclist
  tr TP: bisikletliye duyulan kıskançlık
  EN FP: envy of a bus driver
  tr FP: otobüs şoförüne duyulan kıskançlık
270 | eraser (noun): a small rubber thing that removes pencil marks | loc: silgi
  EN TS: Her eraser became a mountain!
  tr TS: Silgisi dağa dönüştü!
  EN FS: Her eraser became a flower!
  tr FS: Silgisi çiçeğe dönüştü!
  EN TP: a tiny mountain eraser
  tr TP: dağ şeklinde minik bir silgi
  EN FP: a tiny mountain house
  tr FP: minik bir dağ evi
272 | evaporate (verb): to turn into vapour and disappear | loc: buharlaşmak
  EN TS: All the water evaporated.
  tr TS: Suyun hepsi buharlaştı.
  EN FS: All the milk evaporated.
  tr FS: Sütün hepsi buharlaştı.
  EN TP: water evaporating in a pan
  tr TP: tavada buharlaşan su
  EN FP: water freezing in a pan
  tr FP: tavada donan su
273 | evening (noun): the part of the day before night | loc: akşam
  EN TS: Cheers to a nice evening!
  tr TS: Güzel bir akşama şerefe!
  EN FS: Cheers to a nice morning!
  tr FS: Güzel bir sabaha şerefe!
  EN TP: a quiet evening above town
  tr TP: şehrin üstünde sakin bir akşam
  EN FP: an evening at the cinema
  tr FP: sinemada bir akşam
274 | everyone (noun): all the people in a place | loc: herkes
  EN TS: Everyone is on their feet!
  tr TS: Herkes ayakta!
  EN FS: Everyone is in their seats!
  tr FS: Herkes yerinde oturuyor!
  EN TP: everyone cheering at once
  tr TP: herkes aynı anda coşuyor
  EN FP: everyone leaving early
  tr FP: herkes erkenden gidiyor
276 | excursion (noun): a short trip made for fun with a group | loc: gezi
  EN TS: The excursion had a waterfall.
  tr TS: Gezide şelale de vardı.
  EN FS: The excursion had a castle.
  tr FS: Gezide kale de vardı.
  EN TP: an excursion to a waterfall
  tr TP: şelaleye bir gezi
  EN FP: an excursion to a museum
  tr FP: müzeye bir gezi
277 | exercise (noun): moving your body to get fit and strong | loc: egzersiz
  EN TS: Exercise makes her happy.
  tr TS: Egzersiz onu mutlu ediyor.
  EN FS: Exercise makes her angry.
  tr FS: Egzersiz onu sinirlendiriyor.
  EN TP: daily exercise in a garden
  tr TP: bahçede günlük egzersiz
  EN FP: daily exercise in a gym
  tr FP: spor salonunda günlük egzersiz
278 | squat (noun): an exercise: bend your knees, then stand up | loc: çömelme
  EN TS: Sunrise squats in the park!
  tr TS: Parkta gün doğumu çömelmeleri!
  EN FS: Sunrise squats on the beach!
  tr FS: Sahilde gün doğumu çömelmeleri!
  EN TP: deep squats in the park
  tr TP: parkta derin çömelmeler
  EN FP: squats with heavy weights
  tr FP: ağır ağırlıklarla çömelme
279 | exert (verb): to use a lot of physical effort or strength | loc: güç harcamak
  EN TS: He is exerting himself. A bit.
  tr TS: Güç harcıyor. Birazcık.
  EN FS: He is enjoying himself. A bit.
  tr FS: Keyif yapıyor. Birazcık.
  EN TP: exerting every muscle
  tr TP: her kasıyla güç harcamak
  EN FP: exerting power over people
  tr FP: insanlar üzerinde güç kullanmak
280 | kitten (noun): a very young cat | loc: kedi yavrusu
  EN TS: The kitten wants the camera.
  tr TS: Kedi yavrusu kamerayı istiyor.
  EN FS: The puppy wants the camera.
  tr FS: Köpek yavrusu kamerayı istiyor.
  EN TP: a kitten on a bed
  tr TP: yatakta bir kedi yavrusu
  EN FP: a kitten in a basket
  tr FP: sepette bir kedi yavrusu
281 | eyeliner (noun): a makeup pen used to draw a line along the eyelid | loc: göz kalemi
  EN TS: Her eyeliner wing is perfect. Nailed it!
  tr TS: Göz kalemi kuyruğu kusursuz. Tam isabet!
  EN FS: Her eyeliner wing is a mess. Nailed it!
  tr FS: Göz kalemi kuyruğu felaket. Tam isabet!
  EN TP: a winged eyeliner line
  tr TP: kuyruklu göz kalemi çizgisi
  EN FP: eyeliner on the lips
  tr FP: dudakta göz kalemi
282 | eyeshadow (noun): colored powder makeup put on the eyelids | loc: far
  EN TS: Her eyeshadow is pure gold.
  tr TS: Farı resmen altın.
  EN FS: Her eyeshadow is pure silver.
  tr FS: Farı resmen gümüş.
  EN TP: shimmery gold eyeshadow
  tr TP: ışıltılı altın rengi far
  EN FP: blue eyeshadow on a brush
  tr FP: fırçada mavi far
283 | fabric (noun): cloth material used for making clothes | loc: kumaş
  EN TS: Two meters of fabric, please.
  tr TS: İki metre kumaş lütfen.
  EN FS: Five meters of fabric, please.
  tr FS: Beş metre kumaş lütfen.
  EN TP: cutting patterned fabric
  tr TP: desenli kumaş kesmek
  EN FP: fabric for a sofa
  tr FP: kanepe için kumaş
284 | face mask (noun): a creamy product spread on the face to dry | loc: yüz maskesi
  EN TS: Their face masks are cracking.
  tr TS: Yüz maskeleri çatlıyor.
  EN FS: Their face masks are melting.
  tr FS: Yüz maskeleri eriyor.
  EN TP: cracking green face masks
  tr TP: çatlayan yeşil yüz maskeleri
  EN FP: a face mask against flu
  tr FP: gribe karşı yüz maskesi
285 | family (noun): parents and their children as a group | loc: aile
  EN TS: Family photo time. Say cheese!
  tr TS: Aile fotoğrafı zamanı. Çiiiz!
  EN FS: Family swim time. Say cheese!
  tr FS: Aileyle yüzme zamanı. Çiiiz!
  EN TP: a family photo outside
  tr TP: dışarıda bir aile fotoğrafı
  EN FP: a family photo album
  tr FP: bir aile fotoğraf albümü
287 | far (adverb): a long way from here | loc: uzak
  EN TS: The village is still so far!
  tr TS: Köy hâlâ çok uzak!
  EN FS: The lake is still so far!
  tr FS: Göl hâlâ çok uzak!
  EN TP: a village far away
  tr TP: uzaklarda bir köy
  EN FP: far from the city
  tr FP: şehirden uzak
288 | fashion (noun): the style of clothes that is popular now | loc: moda
  EN TS: Even the dog loves fashion.
  tr TS: Köpek bile modayı seviyor.
  EN FS: Even the cat loves fashion.
  tr FS: Kedi bile modayı seviyor.
  EN TP: fashion on a Paris street
  tr TP: bir Paris sokağında moda
  EN FP: a fashion magazine cover
  tr FP: bir moda dergisi kapağı
289 | fear (noun): the bad feeling when something seems dangerous | loc: korku
  EN TS: She is frozen with fear.
  tr TS: Korkudan donup kalmış.
  EN FS: She is frozen with cold.
  tr FS: Soğuktan donup kalmış.
  EN TP: fear on a glass floor
  tr TP: cam zeminde korku
  EN FP: fear of the dark
  tr FP: karanlık korkusu
290 | feeling (noun): an emotion, like joy or sadness | loc: duygu
  EN TS: What a feeling! Goal!
  tr TS: Ne duygu ama! Gol!
  EN FS: What a feeling! A red card!
  tr FS: Ne duygu ama! Kırmızı kart!
  EN TP: a feeling of joy
  tr TP: bir sevinç duygusu
  EN FP: a feeling of boredom
  tr FP: bir can sıkıntısı duygusu
291 | field (noun): an open area of land for crops or grass | loc: tarla
  EN TS: They are in a wheat field.
  tr TS: Buğday tarlasındalar.
  EN FS: They are in a rice field.
  tr FS: Pirinç tarlasındalar.
  EN TP: a golden wheat field
  tr TP: altın sarısı bir buğday tarlası
  EN FP: a football field
  tr FP: bir futbol sahası
292 | fight (noun): a struggle where people hit or push each other | loc: kavga
  EN TS: The pillow lost the fight.
  tr TS: Yastık kavgayı kaybetti.
  EN FS: The lamp lost the fight.
  tr FS: Lamba kavgayı kaybetti.
  EN TP: a pillow fight in bed
  tr TP: yatakta yastık kavgası
  EN FP: a snowball fight
  tr FP: kartopu savaşı
293 | filmmaking (noun): the work of shooting and making movies | loc: film yapımı
  EN TS: Rooftop filmmaking looks fun.
  tr TS: Çatıda film yapımı eğlenceli görünüyor.
  EN FS: Beach filmmaking looks fun.
  tr FS: Plajda film yapımı eğlenceli görünüyor.
  EN TP: rooftop filmmaking at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında çatıda film yapımı
  EN FP: filmmaking in a studio
  tr FP: stüdyoda film yapımı
294 | fire (noun): the flames, heat and light from burning | loc: ateş
  EN TS: The fire is flaring up.
  tr TS: Ateş harlanıyor.
  EN FS: The fire is going out.
  tr FS: Ateş sönüyor.
  EN TP: a fire by the lake
  tr TP: göl kenarında bir ateş
  EN FP: a fire in a kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta bir ateş
295 | mix (verb): to stir things together so they become one | loc: karıştırmak
  EN TS: A hand is mixing with a knife.
  tr TS: Bir el bıçakla karıştırıyor.
  EN FS: A hand is mixing with a spoon.
  tr FS: Bir el kaşıkla karıştırıyor.
  EN TP: mixing paste in a bucket
  tr TP: kovada macun karıştırmak
  EN FP: mixing cake batter
  tr FP: kek hamuru karıştırmak
296 | fish (noun): a water animal with fins, often eaten as food | loc: balık
  EN TS: He is grilling a whole fish.
  tr TS: Koca bir balığı ızgarada pişiriyor.
  EN FS: He is grilling a whole duck.
  tr FS: Koca bir ördeği ızgarada pişiriyor.
  EN TP: a grilled whole fish
  tr TP: ızgarada bütün bir balık
  EN FP: a fish in a tank
  tr FP: akvaryumda bir balık
297 | fishing (noun): catching water animals with a rod or net | loc: balık tutma
  EN TS: Fishing, just to say goodbye.
  tr TS: Balık tutmak, sadece veda etmek için.
  EN FS: Fishing, just to eat dinner.
  tr FS: Balık tutmak, sadece akşam yemeği için.
  EN TP: fishing on a quiet lake
  tr TP: sessiz bir gölde balık tutmak
  EN FP: fishing from a big ship
  tr FP: büyük bir gemiden balık tutmak
298 | fitting room (noun): the curtained booth where you try on clothes | loc: deneme kabini
  EN TS: Third try in the fitting room wins.
  tr TS: Deneme kabininde üçüncü deneme kazanır.
  EN FS: First try in the fitting room wins.
  tr FS: Deneme kabininde ilk deneme kazanır.
  EN TP: outfits in the fitting room
  tr TP: deneme kabininde kıyafetler
  EN FP: a fitting room queue
  tr FP: deneme kabini kuyruğu
299 | wake up (verb): to make someone stop sleeping | loc: uyanmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The dog is waking her up.
  tr TS: Köpek onu uyandırıyor.
  EN FS: The cat is waking her up.
  tr FS: Kedi onu uyandırıyor.
  EN TP: waking up with a dog
  tr TP: köpekle uyanmak
  EN FP: waking up with an alarm
  tr FP: alarmla uyanmak
300 | flag (noun): a coloured cloth that stands for a country | loc: bayrak
  EN TS: She is raising the flag.
  tr TS: Bayrağı göndere çekiyor.
  EN FS: She is lowering the flag.
  tr FS: Bayrağı indiriyor.
  EN TP: raising a flag
  tr TP: bayrak çekmek
  EN FP: waving a flag
  tr FP: bayrak sallamak
301 | float (verb): to stay on top of water without sinking | loc: su üstünde durmak
  EN TS: He is floating on the lake.
  tr TS: Gölde su üstünde duruyor.
  EN FS: He is floating in the pool.
  tr FS: Havuzda su üstünde duruyor.
  EN TP: floating on a calm lake
  tr TP: sakin bir gölde su üstünde durmak
  EN FP: to float in the air
  tr FP: havada süzülmek
302 | flour (noun): a white powder made from grain for baking | loc: un
  EN TS: He is covered in flour!
  tr TS: Una bulanmış!
  EN FS: He is covered in mud!
  tr FS: Çamura bulanmış!
  EN TP: flour like snow
  tr TP: kar gibi un
  EN FP: flour on a cake
  tr FP: pastada un
303 | flower (noun): the colourful part of a plant | loc: çiçek
  EN TS: She is giving you a flower.
  tr TS: Sana bir çiçek veriyor.
  EN FS: She is giving you a cookie.
  tr FS: Sana bir kurabiye veriyor.
  EN TP: a pretty pink flower
  tr TP: güzel pembe bir çiçek
  EN FP: a pretty pink dress
  tr FP: güzel pembe bir elbise
305 | fly (noun): a small insect with two wings | loc: sinek
  EN TS: The fly is back again!
  tr TS: Sinek yine geldi!
  EN FS: The bee is back again!
  tr FS: Arı yine geldi!
  EN TP: a fly on the jam
  tr TP: reçelde bir sinek
  EN FP: a fly in the soup
  tr FP: çorbada bir sinek
306 | flying (noun): travelling through the air | loc: uçmak
  EN TS: Flying over the clouds is beautiful.
  tr TS: Bulutların üstünde uçmak çok güzel.
  EN FS: Flying over the sea is beautiful.
  tr FS: Denizin üstünde uçmak çok güzel.
  EN TP: flying above the clouds
  tr TP: bulutların üstünde uçmak
  EN FP: flying a kite
  tr FP: uçurtma uçurmak
307 | fog (noun): thick cloud near the ground that hides things | loc: sis
  EN TS: Boo! He hid in the fog.
  tr TS: Böö! Sisin içine saklandı.
  EN FS: Boo! He hid in the barn.
  tr FS: Böö! Ahırın içine saklandı.
  EN TP: hiding in thick fog
  tr TP: yoğun siste saklanmak
  EN FP: fog on the mirror
  tr FP: aynada buğu
308 | food (noun): things that people and animals eat | loc: yemek
  EN TS: There is so much food!
  tr TS: Ne kadar çok yemek var!
  EN FS: There is so little food!
  tr FS: Ne kadar az yemek var!
  EN TP: a big spread of food
  tr TP: sofrada bir sürü yemek
  EN FP: food in a fridge
  tr FP: buzdolabında yemek
309 | football (noun): a game where two teams kick a ball into a goal | loc: futbol
  EN TS: Beach football at sunset.
  tr TS: Gün batımında plaj futbolu.
  EN FS: Beach volleyball at sunset.
  tr FS: Gün batımında plaj voleybolu.
  EN TP: barefoot football on sand
  tr TP: kumda yalınayak futbol
  EN FP: football on television
  tr FP: televizyonda futbol
310 | forest (noun): a large area covered with trees | loc: orman
  EN TS: This forest is huge!
  tr TS: Bu orman devasa!
  EN FS: This desert is huge!
  tr FS: Bu çöl devasa!
  EN TP: a forest of tall trees
  tr TP: uzun ağaçlarla dolu bir orman
  EN FP: a forest fire
  tr FP: bir orman yangını
311 | fork (noun): a tool with points for picking up food | loc: çatal
  EN TS: Her fork skills are impressive.
  tr TS: Çatal becerisi etkileyici.
  EN FS: Her knife skills are impressive.
  tr FS: Bıçak becerisi etkileyici.
  EN TP: spaghetti on a fork
  tr TP: çatalda spagetti
  EN FP: a fork in the road
  tr FP: çatallanan bir yol
312 | foul (noun): an unfair action against another player | loc: faul
  EN TS: That was a clear foul!
  tr TS: Bu açık bir fauldü!
  EN FS: That was a clear goal!
  tr FS: Bu açık bir goldü!
  EN TP: a foul from behind
  tr TP: arkadan yapılan bir faul
  EN FP: a foul smell
  tr FP: kötü bir koku
313 | foundation (noun): the skin-coloured makeup base for your face | loc: fondöten
  EN TS: Her foundation is so smooth.
  tr TS: Fondöteni çok pürüzsüz.
  EN FS: Her foundation is so patchy.
  tr FS: Fondöteni çok alacalı.
  EN TP: blending in foundation
  tr TP: fondöten dağıtmak
  EN FP: the foundation of a house
  tr FP: bir evin temeli
314 | fox (noun): a wild animal with red fur and a bushy tail | loc: tilki
  EN TS: The fox is diving into the grass like a swimmer!
  tr TS: Tilki yüzücü gibi otların içine dalıyor!
  EN FS: The fox is diving into the water like a swimmer!
  tr FS: Tilki yüzücü gibi suyun içine dalıyor!
  EN TP: a fox in frosty grass
  tr TP: kırağılı çimenlerde bir tilki
  EN FP: a fox in a henhouse
  tr FP: kümeste bir tilki
315 | free kick (noun): a kick given to a team after a foul | loc: serbest vuruş
  EN TS: His free kick was pure Messi!
  tr TS: Serbest vuruşu resmen Messi'ydi!
  EN FS: His penalty was pure Messi!
  tr FS: Penaltısı resmen Messi'ydi!
  EN TP: a curled free kick
  tr TP: falsolu bir serbest vuruş
  EN FP: a missed free kick
  tr FP: kaçan bir serbest vuruş
316 | freezer (noun): a very cold box that keeps food frozen | loc: dondurucu
  EN TS: The freezer is breathing mist!
  tr TS: Dondurucu sis soluyor!
  EN FS: The oven is breathing mist!
  tr FS: Fırın sis soluyor!
  EN TP: a freezer drawer
  tr TP: bir dondurucu çekmecesi
  EN FP: a freezer bag
  tr FP: bir dondurucu poşeti
317 | french fries (noun): thin strips of potato cooked in hot oil | loc: patates kızartması
  EN TS: The french fries are so hot!
  tr TS: Patates kızartması çok sıcak!
  EN FS: The french fries are so cold!
  tr FS: Patates kızartması buz gibi!
  EN TP: french fries in a cone
  tr TP: külahta patates kızartması
  EN FP: french fries on a plate
  tr FP: tabakta patates kızartması
318 | friendship (noun): the bond between friends who care for each other | loc: dostluk
  EN TS: Friendship is half an ice cream.
  tr TS: Dostluk, bir dondurmanın yarısıdır.
  EN FS: Friendship is half a chocolate bar.
  tr FS: Dostluk, bir çikolatanın yarısıdır.
  EN TP: friendship and ice cream
  tr TP: dostluk ve dondurma
  EN FP: friendship and pizza
  tr FP: dostluk ve pizza
319 | frog (noun): a small green animal that jumps and croaks | loc: kurbağa
  EN TS: The frog is singing a song!
  tr TS: Kurbağa şarkı söylüyor!
  EN FS: The fish is singing a song!
  tr FS: Balık şarkı söylüyor!
  EN TP: a croaking green frog
  tr TP: vıraklayan yeşil bir kurbağa
  EN FP: a frog in a bucket
  tr FP: kovada bir kurbağa
320 | frost (noun): a thin white layer of ice crystals on everything | loc: kırağı
  EN TS: Wow, frost is everywhere!
  tr TS: Vay, her yer kırağı!
  EN FS: Wow, sand is everywhere!
  tr FS: Vay, her yer kum!
  EN TP: grass white with frost
  tr TP: kırağıdan bembeyaz çimen
  EN FP: frost on a car window
  tr FP: araba camında kırağı
321 | fruit (noun): sweet food from plants, like apples | loc: meyve
  EN TS: She wants all the fruit!
  tr TS: Meyvelerin hepsini istiyor!
  EN FS: She wants all the bread!
  tr FS: Ekmeklerin hepsini istiyor!
  EN TP: buying fresh fruit
  tr TP: taze meyve almak
  EN FP: a fruit salad
  tr FP: bir meyve salatası
322 | gambling (noun): playing games for money, hoping to win even more | loc: kumar
  EN TS: She is gambling on red.
  tr TS: Kırmızıya kumar oynuyor.
  EN FS: She is gambling on black.
  tr FS: Siyaha kumar oynuyor.
  EN TP: gambling at a roulette wheel
  tr TP: rulet masasında kumar
  EN FP: gambling on horse races
  tr FP: at yarışında kumar
323 | game (noun): a sports match with rules and a score | loc: maç
  EN TS: The game is going well for her team.
  tr TS: Maç, takımı için iyi gidiyor.
  EN FS: The game is going badly for her team.
  tr FS: Maç, takımı için kötü gidiyor.
  EN TP: a basketball game at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında bir basketbol maçı
  EN FP: a game of cards
  tr FP: bir el iskambil
324 | gaming (noun): playing on a console or computer | loc: oyun oynama
  EN TS: Gaming night: she wins.
  tr TS: Oyun oynama gecesi: kazanan kız.
  EN FS: Gaming night: he wins.
  tr FS: Oyun oynama gecesi: kazanan oğlan.
  EN TP: a gaming night at home
  tr TP: evde oyun oynama gecesi
  EN FP: a gaming shop
  tr FP: bir oyun mağazası
326 | garden (noun): a piece of land by a house for plants | loc: bahçe
  EN TS: Her garden has everything!
  tr TS: Bahçesinde her şey var!
  EN FS: Her garden has a pool!
  tr FS: Bahçesinde havuz var!
  EN TP: a garden at sunset
  tr TP: gün batımında bir bahçe
  EN FP: a garden at night
  tr FP: gece bir bahçe
327 | gardening (noun): the work of growing plants and flowers | loc: bahçe işleri
  EN TS: Gardening is teamwork here.
  tr TS: Burada bahçe işleri ekip işi.
  EN FS: Cooking is teamwork here.
  tr FS: Burada yemek yapmak ekip işi.
  EN TP: gardening in a raised bed
  tr TP: yükseltilmiş yatakta bahçe işleri
  EN FP: gardening on a balcony
  tr FP: balkonda bahçe işleri
328 | garlic (noun): a small white bulb with a strong taste | loc: sarımsak
  EN TS: The garlic smells strong!
  tr TS: Sarımsak keskin kokuyor!
  EN FS: The onion smells strong!
  tr FS: Soğan keskin kokuyor!
  EN TP: peeling a garlic clove
  tr TP: bir diş sarımsak soymak
  EN FP: peeling a garlic sausage
  tr FP: sarımsaklı sucuk soymak
